Later there was a video on the web of them burning some copies of Fairport Convention's Liege and Lief, a reference to a band called The KLF who claim to have burnt a million quid in the early 90s.
“Is that what you’ve settled on?”
Mark Klaas gained national attention after the 1993 murder of his twelve-year-old daughter Polly by Richard Allen Davis, who had abducted her from her home in Petaluma. Davis was a parolee with a long criminal record, and the grim resolution of the case helped galvanize the successful effort to pass California’s Three Strikes and You’re Out Law in both the legislature and by voter initiative in 1994. Klass strongly opposes the initiative to end the death penalty. “I believe Polly and all the other girls and people he victimized through his long criminal history deserve peace of mind,” he told Shafer. “And I believe they can’t get peace of mind until justice is administered, and in this case it’s the death penalty.”
So, add those two to your list! All of the sites I have mentioned can be found under the “Work From Home” page at the top.
I've been absent for one cuz there's all these neat series premiers that have started airing over the last couple weeks; and being out in MY Room with no cable - and having to run an expensive space heater - hasn't inspired me to hang out there in the evenings after work. (Yes Dezzy, I'm totally looking forward to The Walking Dead again.) Now that I have my netbook back I may be better about blogging and watching my shows at the same time. We'll see . .
I have had so much fun doing this makeover, but I guess I had better start thinking about studying for my exam...hmmm maybe I will start that tomorrow;)
A few things I'm loving about you right now:
Why??? Why can’t you be with me. All that you fear is to lose a great friend? But what if we make good pair? And even if we have to break it in future we can do that on good terms and still can be friends. Oh! How should I convince him. He’s too stubborn to listen to me. Let the time decide.
On seeing that flowing collection of headgear on the left of the image, my first thoughts were of the French artist Georges Seurat and his pointillism paintings. Photoshop does provide a pointillism filter and this seemed an ideal opportunity to use it and the results, I believe, suggest that Frank's mother and father might well have been holidaying in Blackpool with the French post-impressionist towards the end of his career.
I’m extremely lucky that I haven’t suffered much tragedy in my life. My childhood was pleasant enough, grandparents and pets died, but that is an expected sad, a normal part of life. Earlier in my twenties I went through some difficulties with my family, my brother caused a lot of tension, my mother had a breakdown and ended up in a pretty bad place, but we got through it all, and I still felt hopeful and happy. I still had my future to look forward to, I still hadn’t lost that hope that my husband and I would do it right, have a life free of strife and tragedy. I stupidly and innocently believed I could be only happy forever, that nothing bad would ever touch me if I did everything right. It shows in the pictures, in our eyes, our purely cheerful smiles.
“Nikki- what is that? Are you doing the downward dog?” he said, prompting me to return my hips to I-am-just-about-dying position.
We will keep the blog up for a while..... not sure what our plans are. This is farewell for now, but not goodbye. We will hopefully bump into you all while playing along with some of the other challenge blogs that are out there. There are so many fabulous ones...
As for those of my readers beyond our borders: go to our consulates, our embassies, call them demand Russian course, demand support for the diaspora, raise the uproar at these crimes against our Mother Land.
Doing unpalatable work soley to earn money is no longer in harmony with the energy sweeping the planet - but if we lose that job that if we were honest with ourselves we didn't love anyway and we spend hours and days and weeks and months running around in circles applying for similar jobs to the ones that left us -
Remember to take the opportunity to reflect back on 2011 and all that you’ve achieved and then set your goals for the coming year.
Pre-K
With massive levels of interest coming from consumers of new mobile devices such as smart phones and tablets, there has been a radical shift in how software is being issued out towards users. The usual packaged software being distributed through CD, DVD or Blu-ray discs could be a thing of the past. If you expect me to use a CD to install a mobile application on my phone, you can forget it.
“I don't believe anything can do as much for a room as a glowing fire in an attractive fireplace. Men and dogs love an open fire - they show good sense. It is the heart of any room and should be kindled on the slightest provocation.”
* Current Net Margin greater than or equal to 5 Yr. Avg. Net Margin (Steady to increasing Net Profits is what we’re after.)
He has caused controversy when asked about welfare this month in Iowa, when unprompted he said “I don’t want to make black people’s lives better by giving them somebody else’s money. I want to give them the opportunity to go out and earn their money, and provide for themselves and their families.” Now only 9% of people on food stamps in Iowa are black and 84% are white. This has led to allegations of racism, particularly as he did not say anything about not giving white people money. It also ignores the fact that nationally there are more white people than black people receiving food stamps and 30 per cent have a job. According to Santorum the biggest cause of poverty in America is the breakup of the family.
I’m not much for gross-out Halloween stuff, but I have to admit these are a masterpiece. The brains are made out of chocolate.
* 13X9 baked cake from a box cake mix or from scratch any flavor you wish (I would suggest a yellow cake just in case you can't get it to cover completely)
I still have power, I am one of my kind…
I've limited the choices to packaged beers available in 12oz containers. I am not limiting the choices to only those styles I enjoy or to year round offerings.
Anyway, I have a moment, this wasn’t a kind moment. It was a moment where I remembered that I need to cancel a meeting tomorrow and it is 4.36pm the Alison leaves work soon I must catch her before she leaves or she won’t get the email until tomorrow. Yes, I could call her, but 1. I’ve lost my phone (haven’t you been reading?) and 2. Even if I used, god forbid, my house phone I STILL can’t call her because her number is in my phone and did I mention I lost my…oh forget it. So basically, this means I have to rush home to email her which in turn makes the whole shopping experience a hurried affair.
Ceylon / Lion Brewery Limited Lion Stout
In the pharmacy I made my way to condom and lube aisle. Just my luck, a semi attractive woman was pacing the aisle. “Which would prefer”, she said without even looking at me.
Coltan, well so far so good! He has helped me in the middle of the night when I'm up with Carson and helped me today with the boys so that I could leave and spend time with my dad at the hospital. I'm so proud of him for stepping up and being responsible in a time of need.
So, take this post with a grain of salt. These are only my opinions, after all. And you know what they say about opinions – “only mine is ever right.” Wait, isn’t that what they say?
Until this year. This year, for the first time in more than thirty years, my husband and I decided we’re going to take a pass on hosting Christmas—we are going to the beach. At first I felt terribly guilty, and even right now I’m a bit unsure—and wonder if I’ll end up changing my mind at the last minute. And yet, I believe it’s the right thing for us to do—for a lot of reasons. One being that my husband’s birthday is Christmas and he never gets to do what he wants on his birthday—this year will be different. But more than that, I hope that our stepping aside will encourage the younger members of our family to find and embrace some of their own traditions—to grow up and look for opportunities to stretch themselves a bit. Because, similar to how and oyster creates a pearl—or how a young mom learns to be a hostess—with some discomfort and distress a burnt turkeys, the end results are truly valuable.
Tonight’s picture is
We got a few km along through more winding hills and she went again. So we pulled over the only place we could which was right on the bend of the road amongst the rolling hills and green green farmland. We called the AAT guys (NRMA sort of people) and then we sat and had apple pie and a cup of tea while the boys played in the grass. It was actually a lovely spot on the side of the road as far as side of the road spots go, and the kids fed millipedes, poked at snails, and chased ladybugs for the best part of an hour before they decided they wanted a blankie to go nigh-nights in the grass :) The car-guy turned up and didn't actually do a whole lot. Tim had told them on the phone what we needed (a clamp thing) and he turned up without one, poked around in the engine for a bit, said he could not guarantee that his jury-rig would work but there was a spare parts shop and a servo about 20 or 30km away. Thanks....
and still now you are! I wanted to be like you '
1) Jokes – My American Friend got Chased Out from a Restaurant.
Today's games:
Wishing Sheila all the best — she deserves it.
The stresses of what people are going through nowawdays is enough to marvel how most of us are able to survive. I was amazed to see the dynamics of the members and us, the demo samplers. Again, that will be another fun entry at a later time.
Locke wonders how he can be sure what he blasted him with.
unfulfilled, unloved, unwanted and undesired, even after sex. Wow! I thought that sex
Hello all - I'm back!!!! The move went well, all boxes have been unpacked and I am ready to start crafting again (although I am still getting used to the new craft room and spending far too much time trying to find things - lol).
I just love their glistening vines collection seen below, they make for a perfect winter layout. But
Let's see... Clear focal point. Check. Minimal layers. Check. "White" space. Check. Well-chosen embellishments. Check. Am I getting it?
Dear friends.
Hi, it's Amy here again with a scrapbook page using the fantastic foils. For this months designer's challenge I wanted to create a vintage page with photos of some of the men in my family tree. I chose the Dark Blue, Turquoise and Green foils as they fitted with the mens theme and used them to cover die cut frames for my photos (see tutorial below).
This is the time of year when the garden in my mind and the garden in my reality have so much in common. With no blister beetles or other annoying bugs, no weeds taking over, no ravenous rabbits and deer, no crop failures, no dog damage, no seeds that never sprouted, no seedlings that should have been put in the ground weeks (or months!) ago, no work that can really be done (though I'm sure I could come up with something if I tried), and all those big plans to harvest the most glorious bounty ever, it's definitely one of my favorite times of year in the garden—until I get hungry of course.
Night of the Purple Moon by Scott Cramer is a young adult post-apocalyptic science fiction. A comet's dust turns the sky purple, and space germs kill everyone who is past puberty. The world is left with a few scientists who were quarantined, and thousands of kids. On an island off of Maine, a group of kids bands together to survive.
I really hope you will enjoy reading them as much as I did writing… (even though I have to say, Mommy is very selfish and doesn’t often let me use her computer…)
I will try and do some catching up Friday. Till then, stay safe and healthy and have a great week!
There’s no age requirement. You could be ten, 15 or 85 and still be able to contemplate living the life of the cursed cockroach. I’m not being Kafkaesque here, as we emos seldom immerse ourselves in literature. Although, in rare bursts of poetic genius, we churn out lines like “Every night I talk to the stars pretending it’s you / It acts just like you though / Far away and never replies to my questions.” That’s emo poetry par excellence.
We feel as though we’ve come into full stride at this point. We are now able to see where we want to go from here and we’re feeling inspired and energized by the simplicity our lives have taken on. It’s becoming increasingly difficult to keep in touch with what we left behind. This concept has provided a lot of meaningful moments of reflection for me. I can’t speak on it yet, it’s new and in process, but soon I plan to reflect generously on it.
“The greatest honour for a man is to sacrifice his life for the country and live up to expectation of the nation.”
You always leave the house keys behind, thus I have to save my legs to rush home to open the door for you. You love traveling but always lose your way in a new city; I have to save my eyes to show you the way.
But the 28-year-old is now back in the side and has reignited City’s Premier League title bid with four goals in three games.
When the sky is clear of all clouds, the stars at night shine very beautifully; similarly, when a person is actually situated in Kṛṣṇa consciousness, he is cleared of all dirty things, and he becomes as beautiful as the stars in the autumn sky.
Workplace Gallery was founded in 2005 by artists Paul Moss and Miles Thurlow. Based in Gateshead UK, Workplace Gallery represents a portfolio of emerging and established artists through the gallery programme, curatorial projects and international art fairs. Workplace Gallery currently resides in The Old Post Office, Gateshead; a listed 19th Century red brick building built upon the site where the important British artist, engraver and naturalist Thomas Bewick (1753-1828) lived and died.
Disfigured: Younus, left, pictured with supporter Tehmina Durrani, has undergone 39 separate surgical operations to repair the damage done to her face. The mother-of-one moved to Italy after the incident to live in Rome and continue her treatment. But on March 17 she took her own life, after leaving a message saying she was committing suicide over the silence of law on the atrocities and the insensitivity of Pakistani rulers.
Despite these setbacks, Indy is still Indy and I cannot wait. It gets more exciting very year!
When I rolled her onto her back, and looked her in the eye, she was aglow. With an honest and expressive joy, she told me what I wanted to hear.
The winner of the
Miss Lamb your lover of fishing farmer here,
Tall mourns and long morns
Inconsistent in his political views? Well, he couldn’t be conveniently tucked into a box labeled “left” or “right,” but did that make him inconsistent? It’s the result of his being an independent thinker.
Robb caught up on some Bible reading which we both got really behind on this past month!
So how does this connect to strawberries you may be wondering, besides the color red. Well when I was younger I remember banging myself up pretty badly(bloody nose included) while rollerblading and since I couldn’t go back out and rollerblade my mums let me sit on the front porch with my ice pack to my face and a bowl of strawberries by my side. So the next time you get a bloody nose, treat yourself to strawberries…and maybe an ice pack it is just the natural and right thing to do (:
a general
Yesterday, the Indianapolis Colts announced that they planned to release their QB of 14 years on this day. In his 14 year career with the Colts, he has brought home one Super Bowl trophy and multiple MVP’s. The Colts seem to have the game plan many predicted going into the off season: trade Manning, draft Luck. With this strategy, you save yourself $28 M you were about to use on a player who hasn’t seen the field since 2010. In addition, you gain on of the most anticipated players of this generation in Andrew Luck.
“More than 80 percent of adult prison inmates are school dropouts. Charging kids with criminal offenses for low-level behavioral issues exacerbates the problem.” This is a warning worth heeding.
Overall, I would recommend Leela’s Book to fans of family soap-operas and to non-Indians looking to get a sense of Indian society. Subcontinentals might enjoy the innovative use of Hindu mythology.
Furthermore, Garfinkel and Ganor point to similarities between the carvings on these boxes and the description of Solomon’s temple. Yet, if one follows the biblical narratives, Solomon’s temple is at least a generation later than these artefacts, in which case, the boxes are not demonstrating specifically biblical artistic motifs, but rather generic religious motifs evident throughout the wider region. The connection with Solomon’s temple is, therefore, weakened. Thus, it seems a bit of a stretch to go basing clarifications of some of the architectural terms in the Hebrew narrative of 1 Kings based solely on these boxes.
That's why I love putting costumes together out of fashion pieces I already own.
I'm already starting to identify some staples that keep popping up in my outfits, like my skinny black belt. I wear it a lot and it helps my outfits feel put together. I'm a big fan of belts in general. They're something small that can create an entirely new silhouette for an outfit. Check out the different uses of my skinny black belt below.
He sits there like it is no big deal.
Then we keep the birthday magic alive by bringing the donation in person to her charity of choice. It feels wonderful to balance out the understandable self-centeredness surrounding a child's birthday with a little outward-focused giving. And let me tell you, a kid bringing a jar of coins into an animal shelter gets some pretty amazing positive reinforcement from the staff.
Just once. ONCE. I would like to move without having to go to the Emergency Room first. Four years ago, The Cajun sliced his finger badly enough to need stitches*, two days before the movers arrived. Last year, one month before we moved up to Boston, he had appendicitis and needed surgery. And this week, just 48 hours before the packers arrived, he woke up in the middle of the night with heart palpitations and spent two days in the hospital. Fortunately, none of these incidents turned out to be serious, but... really. Enough**.
Chronic grudge holders often have anger problems that they are too afraid to face, so they hold grudges, and shame and blame, because it’s easier, and safer for them, than looking at themselves and taking personal responsibility for their part in the conflict, or events. Grudge holders do not understand that people are human, and say and do things that hurt others, often with no malice involved. The anger festers, the grudge grows and takes on a life of its own, and the person holding the grudge is left miserable, trapped my their own anger, and depleted of joy. Oftentimes, their pride it too big to recognize just how badly they are hurting themselves with their undying anger.
DD Fabulous Fruits $10.00
When I hit 20 and death wasn’t looking quite as imminent as I had expected, I hit the books, got into university, studied hard and even built a relationship with my parents. I was still a little wild but I tried to confine it to weekends and between semesters. There was a chance I was going to live a long time.
Why doesn’t anyone ever mention “self discovery” in the numerous lists of “best online dating tips” that can be found on the Internet? It seams that this is something that is often overlooked. I come across so many web sites with huge lists of “best online dating tips”, and I always see the same advice. What I often won’t find in these online dating tips is to first discover who I am, before I go seek my soul mate.
Hey, I can take a little rejection. Even God has to deal with it.
Best Halloween.
YES, I always had freckles!!!
10. Hairbrushes and combs can be cleaned in a baking soda solution.
Foot washing.
Get In a Physical Fight
But over the radio, many voices spoke. As the winds came, the fog was cleared away, but the tension mounted as the wind grew in strength, gusting over 40kts.
One of my favorite things to do is use contrasting fabric to line the Pret-Tea Cosies. In this case, I used what I call a "French influenced design" black/white fabric...and it turned out beautifully.
Don't just write what you know. But don't just create, either. It takes both.
A company from whom I have been ordering cuts for YEARS has done it to me again. They have discontinued a fabric critical to my purpose! Long ago, I planned this project for silk net I can no longer source. So, I have settled for silk net organza, which is a much more dense weave than I prefer, but it will have to do.
Ahh ah ah ah eh eh eh eh ehhh
I used a Foam Brush and Brush the Glaze on,
Jordan is doing really well in school. He is getting a little lazy in getting his assignments in but with a little nudge and threatening he does it. He gets to go early to the breakfast club for the gifted and talented students. I think its pretty cool they are doing stuff like that for the kids. Although that means I have to wake up early and take him. His class is getting ready to get a tortoise, which he is super excited about we donated our fish tank to them. He cleaned it out and kept bugging me to bring it in. He is such a big help around the house when he wants to. He is obsessed with going to the skate park. Its driving me kind of crazy, because everday he asks to go and well I feel mean saying no but it is hard to get chores homework and dinner done before bed time without having to drive him across town.
Despite the fighting
We arrived in due course at the Rayong bus terminal. I got off the bus and started asking for “Koh Samet” and the gesticulating began again. I followed the pointing that led me out of the terminal and hope began to ebb again. At the curb ,however, was a songtheuw and an old man pointing me into it saying the magic words, “Koh Samet.”
To purchase the kit with 10% discount use coupon bodylanguageexpert
It takes a high IQ to want to keep one’s original faith system relevant and vibrant in opposition to one from a foreign land and full of strife, what makes such informativeness on one’s homeland’s native faith system to survive and be strong in one’s own homeland such a low view?
young women have already died for this and yet this industrial murdering machine allows it to continue. And even here in Africa big pharma is threatening to shut all us herbalists down. We won't even go into hackgate and how the entire met in London is free masons. Is there any wonder that justice had not been served for Daniel Morgan or Madeleine McCann.
New York City, 1882. Seventeen-year-old Natalie Stewart's latest obsession is a painting of the handsome British Lord Denbury. Something in his striking blue eyes calls to her. As his incredibly life-like gaze seems to follow her, Natalie gets the uneasy feeling that details of the painting keep changing...
05 Love Will Tear Us Apart (1995 Don Gehman Radio Mix)
*** Wednesdays are Weekly Weigh-Ins: If I weigh myself on a daily basis I will drive myself nuts! Wednesdays are not the traditional “I’ll start by diet on ____day” so I think that works for my Program (since it isn’t a diet!) Plus, I’ve already been weighing on Wednesdays since the baby was born. Note, it is important to record the amount lost for the week as well as the amount lost overall.
And here is why:
Phoenix 0753-82348-9, Jan 2008.
Now she found herself chased, hemmed in, and with no easy escape from the crowding ruins. Beyond the close-packed staring husks of the courtyard, the Ziggurat of the Tyrant rose with stepped sides high up into the afternoon sky to a broad flat top, marking the city center. Scanning ahead, Sharia saw no escape except to hide in the gloom of a ruined building. She chose the closest yawning entrance. Her legs pumped furiously to send her into the shadows, but before she passed into the shade, she heard the stamping dromedaries enter the alleyway behind. War harness jangled as her enemies leapt from their tall-backed steeds and drew their heavy blades.
So I am no longer the "shy cousin sitting in the corner reading books" instead I have been promoted to the Family Historian. Actually this will be fun because I really like my cousin's son and we have a shared interest in our family's genealogy research. And I am probably closer in age to him than to his mother; my cousin.
I think that made an impression on the landlord. Hence all the work that's going into this place.
#1. You wake up with a cold nose! And warming up the tip sometimes doesn’t happen all day!
Roasted Yellow Pepper Soup
Kevin Mulcahy, a Wilson employee with a difficult life and a drinking problem, would become more nervous about the activities he was involved in, going first to the ATF, and then to journalist Seymour Hersh. Terpil was caught skimming from the operation and fled to work for Uganda’s Idi Amin. Tafoya was arrested for the failed assassination attempt. Jerry Brower, an explosives expert who bought up the C-4 for Wilson, pled guilty to conspiracy charges to ship weapons and munitions. Charges are brought against Terpil and Wilson for solicitation to commit murder and shipping of explosives.
With a push, the door swung wide open.
One of the things about Domino, is that they cover a wide variety of styles - from OTT glamour to the makes-no-sense eclectic. A little something for everyone. Readers may not always like, or understand, the selections, but they think about them. Just read the commentary on Jackie Blue Home.
JYJ’s Jaejoong’s little sister (biological half sister), Yoojung, will be following her brothers footsteps, and debuting in the entertainment industry. His mother (biological) tweeted this:
In celebration of my friend and inspired by another good friend of mine, I wanted to write up an abridged list of characteristics of our decade-long friendship. In my mind, any other healthy relationship I have will embody these qualities. I encourage you to make your own list (“relationship contract”) to help you figure out what the ideal friend looks like for you.
briefly i caught my self cursing the beginning of the week and all the things i need to get done, how it would have been nice to get some more sleep and wake up to a spotless house and a baby with all of her teeth so she wouldn’t be cranky.
I done some killin'
She took a step back. How ironic, she thought. He regards me as the player?
Today I am brewing a simple single hop APA with Simcoe. I really love this hop and want to get a good grasp on its profile. I want to give a shout out to the folks at Brew And Grow for helping me with a Carpils sub today but also for letting me know you read the blog, THANKS!! You should always support your local home brew shop.
Resolved, 3rd. That we cherish his memory and recommend to the emulation of the Craft Iris virtues and the uprightness and integrity of his character.
As promised, I'm back to introduce you to several of our Specialist Vendors participating in the Shabby Vintage Junk Extravaganza....While there are 16 of us, some of the team have been so busy working on the Treasures they're bringing to the Extravaganza they were unable to submit their profiles however, I'll include links to their businesses at the end of this post so you can go visit with them before the Show....!!
__The wares of the East Slavs of the 6th-8th centuries from the Prydniprov’ya districts cause considerable interest. The jeweller wares of this epoch reflect the centuries-old worship of Slavs of the powers of nature – Sun, Earth, Water that gives life to the human and all the living.
So, after a lot of thought, I signed up for RIFT.
GameznFlix Review
It's hard for me to wrap my head around the idea that there might be people out there—doctors, even!—who dispute the germ theory of disease. But there are, and some of them are trying to provide medical treatment to terminally ill patients (and anyone else they can convince to put themselves into their hands), as is shown by this post about such a case.
Taking responsibility for my own actions is hard. It would mean admitting I was wrong. Something I hate being. It would also mean that I have failed. Not the best place to be either.
I also stopped at a local coffee shop for a cup of iced coffee. It's a cool little coffee shop. I'm thinking of having our first AI meeting there. They let me leave flyers for AI on there book shelf for papers and things!
It happened so quickly that he had no time to react. One moment he was taking stock of his new surroundings, trying to find a roundabout route back to the main road, and the next he was seized from behind. One large hand clamped over his mouth like a vise and another held something sharp and cold against his throat.
match
The only ones to give him a shot are the elves in Poshnari-Unai. King Loren assigns his best warrior Verdeen to accompany Aryk back to Isadorikja as a helper and witness. Part bodyguard, part counselor and part spy. Aryk has enough on his plate with stubborn clansmen and skeptical neighbors. The last thing he needs is a beautiful cadet with no real battle experience. She’s a distraction he can’t afford. Even though she makes him burn with desire, he has to focus on the mission. He’s got to no time to think of his own needs. With everything he’s got against him it would be so easy to give it up, to just continue things as they are. Unpopular leaders can be replaced. He takes a big risk following his dream but sometimes a dream is all a man has.
"No." She presses her lips together, then smiles. "Thanks." She walks back to the bed, and her hair swings down the length of her back.
Bob, 90, and Nancy Strait, 85. Last month, six racist blacks raped and beat her to death, and beat him within an inch of his life. They had been married for 65 years. The national MSM ignored this racist atrocity because who cares about a couple of old white breeders, anyway? Thousands of Americans had to read the UK Daily Mail, in order to learn about this crime.
5:00 PM: Pretend to bathe by throwing some fresh water over our heads
Last week a patient of mine complaining of cold like symptoms demanded a CT scan of the sinuses. She had been caring for her preschool age grandchild who attended day care and was now experiencing her fifth upper respiratory tract infection in the last 12 months. Her nasal congestion, sore throat, minimally productive cough, aches and pains and overall malaise were typical of the common cold caused by a host of viral agents seen frequently in crowded daycare center classes. She had no tooth, jaw or facial pain. We discussed why she did not need an antibiotic at this point and why exposing her to ionizing x- irradiation made no sense.
A day on your own "Every Friday, I hire a babysitter for the day. It enables me to run errands and do small things for myself (like get a haircut or shop) without worrying about naps, moods, or feedings."— Dianna Cutler
It’s wiser than it’s years and
Dave Samuels – Percussion
Thanks to Trop 50 for sponsoring my writing about fabulous bloggers. This year Trop50 is granting 50 fabulous wishes. Click here to enter for a chance to win $1,000 to help grant a friend's wish!
maybe because his hair is red . . . and curly.
Chris Sharpe is the one supporting character from this generation of Degrassi to make a big enough impression to land on this list. I read a rumor that he was meant to be a main character but got the boot for being chronically late, not sure if that’s true or not. But he served as the new man in a love triangle between Emma and Sean during the third season. He talked like Mush Mouth from Fat Albert and had amazing lines like, “It’s your boy C-Dog, in the house.” and “Kiss sweet bacon” Too bad he stay was short-lived, I don’t have enough fodder for my Chris Sharpe impersonation. Also, the only thing he loves more than DJ is milkshakes, especially of the strawberry variety.
I got so many women
When you are tired, let me carry the load.
The first page is not shown, because it is nothing but a big pocket.
During my father’s first trip to Florida in about five years, he and my mother took me to Super Target. The spending spree to fill Brian’s stomach had begun.
TEPCO wants a "cold shutdown" of the Fukushima plant within six to nine months; a timeline experts say will be tough to meet.
In 1936, when to the dominant minds a thirty-acre farm in Kentucky was becoming laughable, Tate’s essay would have seemed irrelevant as a matter of course. At that time, despite the Depression, faith in the standards and devices of industrial progress was nearly universal and could not be shaken.
Syria is our problem, and something should be done about it. The question is, what? What could we possibly do in Syria that would solve the crisis without causing other problems? I have no faith in Kofi Annan’s peace plan. Assad has made many promises in the past, and has failed to deliver on them. Just like most other dictators would do.
Week 3: one pitiful 3 mile run
shadows passing time in the cemetery
In the midst of all of this, our hearts are centered on Kazakhstan, where our work began. This month, our dream of reaching children in KZ baby houses with improved nutrition comes true – we’ll be on hand for the unveiling of a new national baby house menu based on our groundbreaking study and advocacy there. And we’re planning for the long-term to ensure that the new menu is effectively implemented. Read more below!
As I said, “Kelvin”, it’s your choice. And by the way, before you try your luck - we know you are not really Kelvin Kamwe. We know you have been providing false ID documents in the name of John Paul Emeka, although you used the passport of Daniel Ghaudunkwa and illegally made a counterfeit passport.
Glow Crazy reminds me of childhood (back in the 90’s). Every summer I looked forward to writing my name with sparklers, in the sky. It was a very unique experience, to write your name in the air and to see it almost hover for a moment. It was like magic! It was the only time you could do something like that!
Home and baked cod for dinner with leeks and courgette – much better amount of food than yesterday’s over eating. I seriously need to lose 6 pounds now – I booked us a week surfing holiday the last week in May and I have a wetsuit to try and get in to!
To follow along with the theme of the hop, four of our designers joined in the challenge to Make 'em Laugh with fun and whimsical cards. And what better than to elicit a fun laugh from a card than to include a fun surprise popping up from inside your card? Our designers added fun pop up elements using the Karen Burniston Zig Zag or Circle Scallop 3D Pop Up Dies to each of their cards.
They even have reconditioned phones are available from $10.00 with camera, mp3 player, mobile web access, and blue-tooth capability. Great for young users! Perfect for when they want to Call a friend
Next CONNECTION – they feel closely connected to the other ‘gang’ members
I’m steaming. I am thinking how wrong this all is. WHY does my 17 year old son act more mature than his 38 year old father? WHY is my 17 year old son making efforts that his father is not willing to make? WHY does this make me so darn livid? WHY doesn’t HSSH just stay up there on that shelf I keep putting him on and get better before he has to be part of my kids lives????
Les Perles de la Couronne (France…Sacha Guitry)
and the sun - immodest, obnoxious beast!
Here are the beginnings of our Square Foot Garden...
Heaps going on on the family front.... as usual!! lol. Will be back on the weekend for a bit of a family update.
Hummus of choice
Smudged makeup,
Is it compulsory for students to drink?
I actually had made those flower embellishments beforehand. I saw a youtube video on how to make fabric roses, remembered I had some gauze, and decided to make some on whim. Basically I cut the gauze into 1.5 inch strips, twisted them, and glued them down to a punched circle cardstock in coils. I finished off with some fun big gems.
Beginning in the first person - Four o’clock in the afternoon, and I didn’t feel like very much - he introduces us to the idea that the failed sucide is himself before switching, almost immediate, to the second person in order to more effectively berate and abuse the failure with the appropriate venom. In the first instance this abuse takes the form of him speaking to himself: I said to my self, “Where are you golden boy, where is your famous golden touch?”, becoming more and more harsh and self-deprecating as he sneers to himself, “Hey, Prince, you need a shave.”. The lecture to himself meanders through some very typical Cohen themes of impending death and lost love, repeating And yes it’s come to this, it’s come to this, each time connected to the razor blade he originally intended to use for shaving – the act of presenting a better face to the world.
I want more 'lifestyle' pieces like 'things to do at home nekkid with nothing but a wok.'
Sensory Processing Disorder: Recommendations
But such are the ways of my father as he continues on his weird, pervy, patriarchal path, trying with all his might to instill true lust and depravity in his children, along with other, more useful skills, such as sound financial planning.
“Kendras bak, I cant blieve this. she says its so danny can help her with her singng more. ugh i hate her so mch”
We forget that YOU are not the person we brought onboard to the Panel…your alter ego is. Your alter ego was in need of guidance, wisdom and people who understood what it was to always attract the wrong man and to always end up as Superwoman and Ultimate Doormat no matter how much we promised ourselves we would not fall into that trap again. Your alter ego is smart, funny, insightful and caring. Then Brother Everything came along and who in the hell knows what you have done to her or with her. Did she know you were waiting within, just wanting a chance to pounce and be free or are you a surprise to everyone involved?
Can someone please do me a favor and stop time for just a bit. Please. But, stop it in such a way that allows me to keep working. Every time I look at the calendar and see the days until my departure dwindling, I panic a little.
If you’re a teacher, and you’ve been using Imaginative Realism in your school class, send me photos and a description of your project, and I’ll try to post about it. You can reach me at jgurneyart@yahoo.com.
Remember what happens next in the movie? One day, Forrest decides he has had enough. He's tired. So he just stops running. That's what I feel like right now.
To the cynical mind, it has the unholy stench of an impending totalitarian police state. Part of the insidious progression this Government is making towards total dictatorship and removal of basic human rights. Look at the Media Tribunal Bill and the Protection of Information Act as part of the same package.
-Sluty isn’t confident in the Knicks
2. Gosh. What do you think? Do you seriously think I enjoyed sitting in the schoolyard for hours, dealing with a screaming, thrashing child instead of having him docilely come in the building and play with choo-choo trains? Do you think I enjoyed the stares, the idiotic comments, my personal fear that my kid wasn't going to be okay? Do you think my conscious choice to try not to freak out over the whole thing caused this situation?
The Latino Consent Decree(LCD) program services Latino students in our Phalen Lake Elementary School. The program provides bilingual support for students who are in the process of learning academic English.
What about you? Have you ever given or received an obvious re-gift? Ever experienced an awkward gift exchange? What are your plans for the holidays and how do you handle the giving and receiving of gifts?
Why not? tenor. and Unions. My husband isn't entitled to his job. If he sucks at it, he would get fired. It's the way life works.
Tamarind extract - from the size of 1 lemon or 1 teaspoon tamarind paste
But clients are only allowed to take the 355 GTB for a spin when they have passed their test.
Keavy
you are allowed to combine your DT card with other challenges
If you don’t want the spoiler, read no further than this…
If it sounds too good to be true, it always is. I was looking for cheaper methods of flying across the atlantic, when I stumbled upon this, at Expat Mum's blog.
ESRB Rating: E10+
Toulouse, France
Strain the water mixture through a cheesecloth-lined funnel set over a clean 1-quart glass jar; discard the solids. If necessary, strain again to remove any remaining sediment. Add the infused alcohol and the syrup. Cover and let stand at room temperature for 3 days. Pour the bitters through a cheesecloth-lined funnel or strainer and transfer to glass dasher bottles. Cover and keep in a cool, dark place.
Here now, see now
Facilities: Spotless, so well kept, the staff deserve a big thumbs up.
The singing voice stopped abruptly, as though perhaps startled by itself, and was replaced by a dry, hoarse giggle--a hideous, insane laughter--that erupted into a cackle just as an invisible finger reached out, brushed against the microphone, and pressed STOP.
-green onions
Another important issue with demos is that they should not be wholly negative. Criticism is not the only point. You want to encourage the organization and its employees to change, to stop what they are doing. And, when you do this, the use of reason, rather than emotion, is usually much more successful.
Hi, do you ever have too many work's in progress that you feel overwhelmed and end up working on nothing? that is how I'm feeling at the moment. It doesn't seem to stop me from starting new projects though!
Now she thanks God for every day and takes nothing for granted.
There are times when we have no expectations to save ourselves… Only God can save us. God’s blessing is upon us… Are we calling upon the Lord and putting our faith in action like David did?
Carrying all gates
“Gunny could hear a mouse fart in a hurricane,” Tanner thought.
I got in late, and slept till this morning, when I had an excellent breakfast at Pamela's diner (Tex-Mex omelette) and headed up I-79 to Voodoo Brewery, Blue Canoe brewpub, and Sprague Farm & Brew Works. Then I came back down I-79 to an event at the Cultural Trust (taking a quick detour to BrilloBox first, very nice), a session beer session at Beer School. Following that I had a beer at Six Penn Kitchen with Tony Knipling, beer-guy supreme from Vecenie Distributing, and Scott Smith, everything-guy at East End Brewing. We toasted a good situation, and wrapped 'em.
People seemed to haunt these time stations too, as railway stations seem haunted by the passengers passing through. It is a place of temporary – and temporal – disturbance where people only pass through, but can never call it home or come to rest there.
This year, all four of us got to make another trip to Disneyland (and Universal Studios and the beach). Glad we were able to go with family and friends (besides they were much better at taking pictures than we were this time).
Foyer:
In the meantime, as speculation grows that Israel is poised to mount a lightening strike on Iran's nuclear facilities, RadisIN is sticking to business as usual, despite attempts by the Iranian regime to shut them down.
I remembered an old proverb that goes something like this .. taste and talent can never be hidden.
If any of you can reccomend me places to get room decor I will love you forever!
Max is over the moon excited about Blake's Winter Snowboarding Retreat. We're working on the details, and hope Max will be able to attend in Dec.
I've pulled in to a gas station, and have a quarter tank of gas...and
This article leaves out the obvious reason that has long been the reason park and rides are added to projects I work on in the AA phase - goosing up ridership. Federal funding rating has long been based on cost per new rider, and if you can't get costs down, you can always get ridership up (in the models, at least) by adding park and rides.
JRWVT Blog (jrwvtblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
My question to you then, Dear Reader, is: should I contact this woman and insist that she pay Nicole? I would do this nicely and maybe pose it as something she forgot to do. Do I have to get Nicole's permission before I do this, or should I just go ahead and try to collect?
“We ask that you turn your anger toward the (state) House of Representatives,” he said, adding that his group does not support or condone slavery while the Bible, which he called “evil,” does.
There is some nice tabled seating further in from the main bar. Nice and dark so a great place to take a special someone or just one of your sad male friends who also have no one of the opposite sex to drink with.
Dear BASNCR members,
Outlook has been published in New Delhi continuously since October 1995 by the Outlook Group, whose founding editor-in-chief is Vinod Mehta. In October 2008, Mehta appointed Krishna Prasad as Outlook's editor. Earlier, Prasad edited the magazine's special issues. Prasad also publishes the popular blog Churumuri.
Okay. Have a good day. Goodbye.
3KCBWDAY3: Day 3: 25th April
As most countries in the farm holiday italy pompei but grain, livestock, dairy, fruit and olive oil production. Apulia, among other investment options, has the farm holiday italy pompei and the farm holiday italy pompei along excellent cuisine and wine regions, is sure to set up a northern republic failed. Alienated from Hitler, despised by many of his own people, he and his lover were captured and executed by Italian partisans.
“Pardon me, ma’am, but the doc…’ He stopped short, his mouth gaping.
This past weekend we had our new annual party....Breakfast with Santa....I thought it was SO fun and by far my favorite party that I have ever thrown! I served breakfast (just think kolaches, quiche, fruit, muffins, sausage balls and chicken minis) and fun morning cocktails (mimosas, Bloody Marys, screwdrivers) and of course little sippy cups for Santa's Elves! Santa made his appearance at 10:30 am....Lots of happiness, crying and screaming from all 30 kids....Yes, I'm crazy for having this many children at my home but it was SO worth it and by the amount of friends that we have I'm sure it will be more next year! From all the chaos I didn't get that many pictures during the party. All I have to say is, I'm SO thankful that it didn't rain. If it would have rained I'm pretty sure my house would be ruined and this annual tradition would already be over....BUT its not! I already got the green light from Justin that next years party is on :)
(a) Their past.
I have nowt decent to communicate: posts about their/his wonderful music can no doubt be found elsewhere.
Add Cauliflower when roasted, both cans of Chicken stock, a half of Can or so of Water (Cover Veggies w/ liquid.) Simmer for a couple of hours and either use an emusifier OR a "Big Ole" French wire wisk,,,,,,,,and break "Cauli" apart. Add the "Non Fat" Half and Half to a desired consistency.......I think I added about a cup and a half. Simmer a Bit longer.....
Row 2: Cast on 2 stitches, knit to the end of the row. (10 stitches)
The darkness of night came. It was his first night fallen. The stars seemed far away…further than they had ever been. He was lonely, sad, and lost. Even worse, he was blind in the darkness of the night. He was Samuel the Blind; but he would search for her until he found her or until the darkness caused him to forget the only thing he had, her face.
Other - Hexagon pattern from GS 107 Class, Flowers, button and twine from Stash, MME Lush Journaling Tags.
If you have children leaving the house, this is a change. If you are getting married, this is a change. If you have a new job or job loss, this is a change. If you have a new baby, this is a change.
At Primestream®, we believe all tasks that can be automated should be automated – so that producers and editors are free to focus on decision-making, communicating, and creating. That’s the philosophy behind all Primestream solutions that include the highly acclaimed B4M FORK™ software platform for complete Media Asset Management and Production Automation ultra-efficient workflows.
P.S. There were some great sad pictures of Virginia Wolf in the Media Gallery under Recommendations on my posting page and I copied them and put a line of one picture at the top of the post and a line of the second picture at the bottom. They seemed to say what I just said, only in that worth-a-thousand-words sort of way. But they won’t come over onto the published post. Not surprising. Even pictures don’t work for me right now.
Primp the front porch.
First of all, they notified me that I needed to apply for this program back in January. At that time, I had already been unemployed four months or 120 days.
Yes, among other things.
Several feet.
We walked back to the car, in that way peculiar to kids which combines an amble and an eddy. She wrote her name in the dirt with the rock. I contemplated the beauty of my legacy, and the shell in her dainty hand. The sun, the river, my lovely daughter enchanted me. In a nacreous whorl the size of a cherry, I saw my place in this universe: to breathe, to be content, to know love.
Spoon into the muffin cups and bake for about 20-25 minutes. Remove from oven and let cool in pan for 5 minutes. Remove from pan and continue cooling until cool enough to handle.
1 applications
inimitable;)
I know this sounds a bit far-fetched, depending on how far you wanna be fetched, but this is a true story. Seeing that I’ve always liked stories, even as a child. I’ll start this one with….
The Sun loses its glow during an eclipse. The planets war with one another when they occupy the same location in the sky (currently we measure it as the same zodiac degree).
I’ll speak and I’ll bitch
Every morning they trod the path from the town to the shrine at the top of the hill. It took two hours there and back, give or take – more in inclement weather. The path was rough and more suited to goats than to people. It clung to the sides of the hill and clothed it.
Ain’t no losers
These things, concrete
*As noted above, items with an asterisk should be avoided by all members of the human race.
Denise Jaden, whose YA novel LOSING FAITH debuted in 2010, had a great post a while back in which she discussed the befores-and-afters of being a debut author. One of the things she discussed was reviews. The whole post is hilariously tongue-in-cheek and worth reading in its entirety, but I’ll summarize the review portion: before you get any reviews, you think you’re totally ready for anything anyone has to say about your book. Then you get reviews and realize you aren’t.
A Bridge Too Far (dir. by Richard Attenborough, 1977)
Let’s say there’s an incident on smith road on Sunday morning at 0100. We plot it on the map and the pie chart. A few days later on Friday morning at 0001 there’s a report of gunfire a little closer – we plot that. And another the next night a break in at 0220 even closer- we plot that as well.
song: Hoppípolla
I think that’s it for now. Have to go finish laundry and getting our stuff together before we head back to camp.
For those of you who constantly crusade for the truth about 9/11/2001 to be released, and for a new investigation to be initiated, I only have this to say… This will never happen under the current system of corporate government. Again, the king will not punish himself. 9/11 is a cause that is dear to my heart, since I watched the events of that day from my roof in New York City just a short distance away, and had the missing persons center right across from my front door. I will never forget that vision or that sound from that day. But again I must reiterate that while protesting and handing out literature and movies has been a great tool in waking up the people about 9/11, it is time to take a different path. All of our scattered groups must unite in one peaceful cause. That cause, in order to effect real change, should be the exposure of the Comprehensive Annual Financial Reports and collective ownership and investment wealth of our government. You see everything else will follow… Audits will be done at all levels of government, mandated by the people who vote for TRF’s. Information will flow freely from the private hands of corporate government back into the hands of the public. All truths will be necessarily exposed in this way – through mandated audits. And the impenetrable wall that is our corporate government will eventually fall back into the publics’ tax-free hands. And those responsible will be held accountable. But until this wealth and power is transferred back to the people, we as a bunch of minority advocacy groups will never accomplish anything… unless we unite into one cause and become the majority. For the system will never reveal itself. Nor will it punish itself. 9/11 will remain hidden in the same warehouse as JFK, Waco, and other cover-ups until this new information has been discussed and spread far and wide. War crimes will not be administered until CAFR’s and government wealth are exposed and the military is once again a public entity controlled by congress and the United States is taken out of the United Nations.
Today we made our way to three wineries - Domaine Huet, Les Caves de Loires and Maison Bredif. Huet was the vineyard I was most excited about and our first stop of the day. I've had their sparkling wine from their Clos Du Bourg vineyard and have really enjoyed it. Today we tried sparkling and still wines from their three vineyards - Clos Du Bourg, Le Haut-Lieu and Le Mont. Of the three, Le Haut-Lieu was my favorite. The wines under the Haut-Lieu labels tended to be a bit simpler but with a really smooth and velvety mouth feel. Really lovely. Then again, I always find it hard to like the most complex wines during straight tastings without any food. Ahh, the tough life of a self-professed wine snob.....
There is one scene of caution. Some mean boys decide to be rough on Mickey- so they lure him out in the woods and hit him. I believe only a couple punches are shown before Mickey falls. He is shown the next day - with scratches and red marks on his face. It is handled carefully. There is a great message in this about bullys and doing what is right.
"Well a guy who was involved in a stabbing last night just ran through those two yard and either ran through your yard or your neighbors. We caught him on the other side of your wall."
Sold activity (demand) is now equal to the amount of available homes for sale (supply) so the neighborhood at a balanced real estate inventory.
I hope you enjoy my review of the 2008 Alaskan Smoked Porter. This review is in conjunction with my post for The Session #26 Smoke'em if you Got'em. I had planned on drinking the 2007 release but after a long week at work and 10 week old at home I got permission from the wife to have a happy hour. So me and my buddy went to this new wine bar (they sell beer and spirits also) and had a beer and a cigar. I chose the the Alaskan Smoked Porter to get credit for the session requirement.
Article 13 of Council Regulation (EEC) No 1768/92 of 18 June 1992 concerning the creation of a supplementary protection certificate for medicinal products, as amended by Regulation (EC) No 1901/2006 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 12 December 2006, read in conjunction with Article 36 of Regulation No 1901/2006, must be interpreted as meaning that medicinal products can be the object of the grant of a supplementary protection certificate where the period that has elapsed between the date of lodging the basic patent application and the first marketing authorisation in the European Union is less than five years. In such a case, the period of the paediatric extension provided for by the latter regulation starts to run from the date determined by deducting from the patent expiry date the difference between five years and the duration of the period which elapsed between the lodging of the patent application and the grant of the first marketing authorisation.
“Livvy, a new guy! We’ve been with the same tired group of boys since we were five…”
Jayne treats Leah's unhappiness with herbal remedies, cowslip wine and common sense in equal measure. In return Leah works hard for the delicious home-cooked meals they share. She wrestles with sheep, breaks nails and gets stuck in the mud - learning as much about herself as she does about farming. Soon Leah is happy milking cows, mucking out pigs and falling halfway in love with Duncan, a dishy tractor driver.
I find myself thinking about competing again. Part of me still wants to just sit down and figure out all the events I want to attend in 2012. I find myself still dreaming of Intermediate and Advanced with this horse. I still have that yearning. At his last ultra-sound in September, the vet said that he looked amazing considering the original incident and to not lose hope yet. That almost makes it worse. I know I won't be retiring Ed flat-out anytime soon: he loves working too much. But, I don't know if he will be eventing ever again. I guess we will see in January.
Goal: Develop your main character.
He manages it. Unfortunately, the queen isn't familiar with the word "no," and she informs the Prime Minister that she wants that horse, and please see to it.
At the end of 1959 my mum made me a new dress to wear to the end of year dance, which is now called the school formal. My dad took some photos of me. He made me pose this way and that and I was feeling embarrassed. I was happy when it was over.
Gaming reinforces players through positive feelings generated by achievements, which are perceived through points, badges, discounts, or any award—tangible or not. Game mechanics are, simply, ways of generating those positive feelings.
12th of January 2011
What, then, is to be done? Riggs feels it is not enough for Bigfoot and other anomalies to remain as curious little diversions and oddities. Steps must be taken to not only research anomalous phenomena in more detail, but also to preserve the areas where such phenomena occur. In doing so, he says, we might acquire a deeper knowledge of ourselves as human beings and of the nature of reality itself.
I'm going to speak.
I didn't say I wanted to be exactly like her, but she's a pretty awesome person. She's funny, loving, hard working, a great writer, a great friend, and one of the most generous people I know. I She has helped me through so many difficult periods in my life -- she is my rock. She has been there to share for some of the most joyous moments in my life. It's important to me to make her proud. Most importantly, she's the perfect mom for me and I'm blessed to have her.
“I urge, then, first of all, that requests, prayers, intercession and thanksgiving be made for everyone, for kings and all those in authority, that we may live peaceful and quiet lives in all godliness and holiness.” (NIV)
“The Pardon and Parole Board is not church,” Whittaker said.
The creation took most of the 4 cans of frosting, all the cupcakes, a good amount of mess (as well as unwanted attention from the cats), a few well-chosen vocabulary words on occasion...and almost 3 hours later my efforts were complete.
After swapping the tea canisters out I stuck the old one in a cabinet. Tonight I was thinking about a cookie jar after we made a fresh batch of sugar cookies and that tea canister came to mind. It would be the perfect size! Since it only says "tea" on one side, I decided to turn it around and add "cookies" to the other side!
click to enlarge
The Top Three as chosen by TEAM S.A.S. are as follows (in no particular order.) You can visit any of the winners blogs or the sponsor's websites just by clicking on their names. And for more inspiration and to see the Top Three cards, please visit our Pinterest board here.
Voice unheard. Irish voice unheard, then unnerved it
Like crap crap.
After all, it was Feldman who was responsible for the disastrous decision to bring in David Rowland, a multi-millionaire former tax exile who had been based in Guernsey for 40 years, as Tory treasurer in June 2010.
We drove to NYC (11 hours). Mapquest got us to our hotel perfectly. Make sure you have cash on hand for all the tolls leading into the city. I can't remember exactly, but I think the Lincoln and Holland Tunnels were both $12 and other tolls were a little over $2. Parking is expensive. I printed out several coupons for "guaranteed low price" on parking garages; however, Randy got totally rejected when he tried to give the guy a coupon. He was emphatic with "40 bucks firm," so we ended up paying $120 for our 3-days there. Still, we felt comfortable that our van was safe, and the price of tolls, parking and gas was still way, way less than 4 plane tickets! (Plus, I got a whole lot of reading done on the car trip!)
Yes. Yes, I was fine, I was doing fine. I went back downstairs, and the subject had passed. We had a Mexican feast, and continued on our jolly evening, until the boys took their leave. And I followed Brian's lead after they left: I cried.
But He comes to help us finish the race!
from where you left off - again.
Drop in pregnancy complications after smoking ban
I'd like to say that things around my house are all rainbows and butterflies all the time but they're not. This month the kids have been out of school and they're driving me crazy like you can't believe. I am officially the meanest mom ever because I can't tolerate even a second more of the insanity and I snap at them constantly.
which I think is meant to be a plant stand, at a yard sale for $5.00 and the
I'll miss:
(P.S. This was Ollie last July. We were creating a story about Detective Ollie and his faithful sidekick, Mr. Giraffe. We are an imaginative bunch.)
Sadly, my uphill kick was like Bruce Lee now, and not Bruce Lee in 1972. Brock and Bobby were too strong to catch, though I did have enough for one final acceleration to the line to hold off Devin. Bobby finished the rather hilly course in 30:46, Brock was next in 31:21, I hit 31:30, Devin was 31:34, and Marc/Alex finished sub-32.
To the parking meters that line the sidewalks,
Can I just say it again?
But first I just want to remind you that Scott is 3 years old
"I am totally psyched for this abortion!"
I wanted to post some of the tweaking I have been doing this week in the house. I don't know why, but everything I did I am not quite satisfied with. I guess I am in a mood. So you may see some more tweaking in the near future.
-The end-
11. waders
Remember too that the PM said at first that she paid for her sister our of her own pocket…since the treasury paid for Vidwattie Newton’s trip to India are we now saying that the Treasury is Kamla’s pocket?
This one is much shorter.
John Veitch of Dawyck lived at Dawyck in Drumelzier parish. His house was pulled down in the 1830s and its stone reused to build the present house. Dawyck is still a private residence, but the heart of his estate is open to the public as a Royal Botanical Garden.
carrots 1 red onion
Yesterday’s piece was another sunset. This time a fabric collage using watered down acrylic on fusible. At the moment it’s collage on fabric but I think it’s going to become a small art quilt so this may serve as the basis for another piece sometime this week. Meanwhile, I’m off to do the last pour on my painting.
Time is a strange thing. Where does it go? Slips through our fingers like silken cloth.
Big Horn Brewing Co
I don't really know how to begin to write about my first skype experience. To say that it was touching is an understatement. To say that it was a blessing and an encouragement falls short.
We were really busy and had alot of family things going on.
We kind o' thought Christ went agin war an' pillage. ~James Russell Lowell
I stated in my previous post that in order for Wildrose to make a significant dent in the PC’s dominance of Alberta they would have to see their support in at least one region match or surpass PC support. In the polls conducted between mid-February and the week before the writ was dropped, they hadn’t yet achieved this, though they were a close second in Calgary. By the time that the writ was dropped, Wildrose had moved into a slim lead in Calgary and tied the PCs in “rural” Alberta (that is, anywhere outside Edmonton and Calgary). Polls conducted in the first week of the campaign show Wildrose having moved into solid leads in Calgary and rural Alberta and even threaten the PC lead in Edmonton, which would mean that Wildrose victories in the capital now become possible, an unthinkable proposition before the campaign began. Indeed, the rise of Wildrose in Edmonton and the corresponding decline of PC support is turning the city into a four-way battle between the PCs, Wildrose, the Liberals and the NDP. All four parties currently poll between 17% and 29% in the capital.
Deputy Joan Burton: ￼ ￼ He should not use that kind of language in this House in reference to any women and he should withdraw it.
BRPKA Blog (brpkablog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
But there was only silence. And then Ian fell off his chair. She tried again, and there was silence. And then Ella, sitting on my legs, started to fuss. She tried a third time, and then said she'd feel better if I had an ultrasound. There was no drama, no hysterics. Amazingly, I was completely calm. We just heard him the other day, he was fine.
"I have to thank Jamie Meares for saving my dining room. I was really stuck on painting a china cabinet but when Jamie dropped off the wardrobe for our room she suggested a vintage buffet. The table is such a big piece that adding a large china cabinet would have over crowded the room. We found this vintage Thomasville buffet on CL. The owner even had the papers, it’s from the 50’s and is in perfect condition. It holds all of my serving pieces, cake stands, vases, table clothes, and other linens.
- Consciousness: an awareness and ability to accept and feel the experience
Topbox makes their packaging as small as possible to be as earth-friendly as possible!
"Happiness is not having what you want. It is wanting what you have." ~Rabbi Hyman Schachtel Question: What are your simplest pleasures that cost little to nothing?
Second, our family has a lot of four legged members and they are a part of our family as much as Uncle Andrew or Granddad or Grandmom is! Many programs that Mom contacted told her they would only giver her a dog if the family gave up the other animals, which was totally out of the question. Everyone here is well taken care of, spoiled and healthy and loved.
I exist in a vacuum tube labelled “you have mail”,
143Where awful arches make a noonday night,
The scene is hilarious. And if a moody organ drone were played over top of it, we’d suspect Murnau wasn’t in on his own joke. But instead, we’re given flutes and clarinets—music to skip through a meadow by.
Is 2011 really a Centenary?
I'm back to half stitches in one and two strands so its taking a bit of concentration but getting there.
But he doesn't eat any one thing more than two or three times, and I knew that we had maybe one more chance with the "Boots and Barkley" before he would reject it. So I drove to Petco and bought four or five varieties of stew-like canned food, soft food with gravy. On my way home I was listening to a CD that Doug's sister gave me for Christmas, little snippets of recordings from RTE radio over the years. It's great stuff--Yeats, and Eamon de Valera, and Brendan Behan, and each spoken-word piece followed by a piece of music.
The fact the minimalistic and strappy flat sandals were worn with formal suits and dresses changes the nature of wearing this style of sandal which typically has been a casual option.
The idea is to say no nicely, cause you will have to say it. Ignoring it is a downfall and will bring trouble, yelling at someone or making them feel less than you is another wrong way. Just be nice when you say no, you don’t want to hurt their feelings. It’s hard to say no for most of us in the best way possible and usually there isn’t an easy way. When rejection is in the air, it will cause issues. Be gentle when you have to say no and not rude.
Night came, the drizzling dissipated and I cracked open the slider, allowing in cold night air. The living room was dark except for a Diptyque Baies candle dancing shadows on the wall. I poured myself a glass of dark red Zinfandel and sunk into my leather armchair.
Some children receive treatment to delay puberty and buy them time while deciding whether to proceed with a gender change.
A long time ago, when I saw Queenship as an aspect of service toward the Goddess of the Wicca, I was handed a list of twenty-one points of behavior, or Protocols, which I was expected to uphold in addition to the Rede and the Charge. When the Goddess finally released me, late in 2010, telling me to follow my heart rather than feel obligated to serve her, I continued to strive to uphold her list. Now that my Lord has taken me into his care, however, I’ve been required to take new vows, and after doing so, the Prince quickly revised my list.
I must admit that I have been a great admirer of tennis legend Leander Paes. While my love for him began with his sharp volleys at the net, he has remained consistently at the top of my sporting chart for things beyond sport. If one wipes off the thin layer of dust on his numerous grand slams, one can easily find the shining example of a life extraordinaire. His recent victory at the Australian Open men's doubles along with Radek Stepanek is yet another example of how great partnerships start from trust and lead to glory.
willy-nilly
So, we walk into the restaurant, and it's a little after 5pm.
So here is the extended update from yesterday...
So, taking all your fabulous suggestions into account, the peeps went over to the neighbors' house to talk to them. We hadn't heard a thing about Plymouth, no apology or anything. But, at least once since the Plymouth attack, their dogs had dug under the fence (which is almost 5 feet high and chain link) and were in OUR yard! Thank dog we were inside both times.
Outfit 2 - Eggplant + Camel + Touch of Berry
Princess Minis Get Silvers on all 80 levels
Your typical personal characteristics are: the ability to manage and organize people on the basis of ideas and social-political concepts, the eagerness to force issues and to produce crises, to change people’s beliefs, to reform and transform, to build ideological structures or systems, to work hard toward some future goal regardless of the immediate results; a tendency toward humor or the inability to take criticism; a dictatorial attitude.
This morning as I was puttering around the kitchen he came out all crazy haired carrying his puppy and wrapped his arms around my legs. I lifted him up and he put his hands on my face and said, "Mom, when I'm all grown up I will still come and sit on the couch with you and watch whatever movies you want."
like water
36
AI-Southern Oregon is working with AI-Portland to raise awareness about Maternal Healthcare worldwide, hosting a Portland event:
8. If the hand crafted item is wearable then WEAR it, if it is decorative USE it. If you are so overwhelmed that you want to take care of it so it won’t get destroyed FRAME it. If you choose to do none of these things give it back to the person that made the item because you do not deserve it.
Masaru Emoto
We walked, in the rain, around Roubaix. Roubaix is famous for its art galleries and textile heritage, and it is the site of not one, but two outlet villages for buying designer clothes cheaply. It also has a museum in the site of an old workers' swimming pool - water has been left in - which has a glorious stained glass window.
Life Key: Carry On, Only What You Need.
3.) moving on to the skulls; they are human skulls.
Of that low Italy shall he be the saviour,
1/4 tspn sesame oil
On Friday, these two beauties arrived at my door. Squee!
I don't know how this happened, but it has been over a year since I posted anything under my 'Artists and Cottage Industries' label. So today I thought it would be fun to invite you to jump "across the pond" with me to visit these three lovely UK shops.
Joulupukki is cerebral electronic music fueled by dark ambience and introspection. These are soundscapes that are at once glacial and volcanic, driven by minimal beats that feel post-industrial and post-techno. There is a consistently somber mood presented here. Certain pieces hint at martial percussion and there are even sounds that invoke concepts of science fiction and Marinetti's retro-futurism that are all shrouded in Orwellian discontent. Later there is a track of doom-laden electric guitar that ever so slowly cuts through the breakers of the Baltic Sea.
Will-Joy Christie / Two Poems / 38
He eventually got a teaching position and his entire life became devoted to teaching, writing, and praying.
Vegans Against PETA
I deliver homegrown produce to local food pantries who feed the hungry. Chances are I have pick-ups and helpers in your neighborhood too. If you need boxes, I can even donate boxes.
And I'm happy because I survived the bat mitzvah...have to get through the national conference next week (looking forward to that but there's a ton of stuff I have to do there and other work besides), and the wedding plans are moving along. They found an apartment, the wedding date, place, music and photographer are done. Still have to do a bunch of things, but we're getting there.
On their own, these Ayurvedic treatments will support your energy, but you should likewise address the root situation that is emptying your energy. In mixture with the right workout regimen, and even more importantly healthy digestion with the suitable diet regime, the health supplements can seriously enhance the lower energy, exhausted state you may locate your self in. The inherent nature of Ayurveda takes under consideration many aspects. Consuming correct, nutritional supplements and certain workout techniques in yoga, pranayama, and meditation can actually set you up on the path to a more gratifying way of life. Take these tips to heart, take into account adding the likes of Ashwagandha and Chyavanprash to your eating plan, and you will absolutely begin to find out a difference inside a quite short time frame. Deal with tiredness by ensuring your way of life and eating plan are in-line properly and make use of Ayurvedic herbal products that will help you.
90% of the time there is not even any dialogue! Imagine how much easier it is to put sound back in during post production than setting up all those microphones out on the streets. The only problem is that it makes the movie even that much more boring, so when he's not strangling, he's thinking to himself a lot!!!
Right now, Intel Sandy Bridge is 32nm, Ivy Bridge is 22nm, AMD Operton is 28nm, Xilinx is 28nm, Achronix is 22nm and the microprocessor market share main event is between AMD and Intel over design wins in mobile systems. Server-side Intel holds 95% market share to AMD 5%. Intel tries to set expectations of 22nm by 2013 and 14nm by 2014, here for example while showing the Chandler, Ariz 14 nm fab construction, here. Recall that things do not always move so smoothly for Intel, think about the relatively recent 8M Sandy Bridge support chip recall and Itanium. On the other hand AMD’s problems appear to be a shade worse than Intel’s witness: ars technica on Server market share here, The Register here, Extreme Tech here. I don’t know how much these websites are owned or comped by Intel, but if i am holding a bunch of Opteron server-side exposure it is probably safe to argue that it’s time to think about a hedge.
When I saw the lovely downloads Lesley had designed I spotted a match with some really pretty buttons I had recently purchased. I had th idea of trying to make a card with something that looked like a pack of vintage buttons.
Now it looks as though they're here to stay (friggin' termites)
One craft down, many more to go. :)
Drugs were the only
As if to share a secret he knew,
Remember, this blog is focused on the political perspectives of young people. We can’t tell you how often we hear these sorts of things from young liberals. EVERY WEEK I have discussions with several people over these false statements that they wholeheartedly believe. Forget reading facts, arguing with teachers, or understanding both sides of the spectrum before making a decision.
Homestyle turkey lunch meat (98% fat free) from the Deli.
It is for this reason that some mystics say “past” and “future” are misleading concepts.
Once it's dry it'll be totally flat again, but you'll be left with an interesting pattern:
And in two weeks I will get to hold the babies. Feel their skin, their warmth, their breath, hold their tiny hands, peek at their tiny feet. It may only be for a few hours but it will be the most precious hours of my life.
I loved sitting out front with him,
A cast-iron bridge, linking Ovingham with Prudhoe, was built across the Tyne in 1883. It replaced a ford, and was built after a young Ovingham miner was drowned crossing the river on his way to work. The steel tubes are marked Dorman Long Middlesbrough, the firm which designed and built the Sydney Harbour Bridge and the Tyne Bridge. It was joined by a footbridge built alongside in 1974.
and what kind of god can this be anyway
Since we've been together, my fiance and I have never been out on Valentine's Day, mostly because the thought of a crowded restaurant doesn't seem that romantic to him. This time we decided to give going out a try but of course, I still had the inkling to make him something, surprise him with a chocolaty gift. I decided on breakfast in bed and came upon this recipe from Two Peas and Their Pod for a Chocolate Dutch Baby. This recipe also gave me an excuse to buy a cast iron skillet which I'd been wanting for quite sometime. Immediately after I bought it I came home and began searching for recipes to try in my new skillet.
Last Sunday, Action celebrated his First Communion at church. And our wonderful families came to town to help him celebrate. He was excited and nervous. But everything went smoothly and he looked dashing to boot :)
Oh gee we make it so hot Girls generation we won’t stop
Some have attempted to justify their stance on this concept with what is apparently intended as a daleel (Islamic evidence), and so have used a narration to justify this concept of Jihad an-Nafs or dealing with all the political and military problems we face by becoming introspective or looking inwardly as opposed to looking at the Ahkam Shari’ah and seeing what Allah (Subhanahu Wa ta’ala) has demanded from us.
Hello and happy Thursday stamping friends! Today is my turn to share a special little project with you all that I have created for the "Time with" post over at the Our Daily Bread Designs Blog. With Christmas fast approaching I thought it would be fun to share a quick and easy little gift idea. I don't know about you, but every year I seam to need just one more last minute gift that I somehow forgot about or I decide to give to someone unexpectedly. Usually I go to my local grocery store to pick up a gift card, but not this year. I came across this fun little project and decided to give it a try. It is fairly inexpensive, which is another plus, but it sure does not look inexpensive ;D;D
I think we hit every thrift store within a 10 mile radius. It was a lot of fun! :)
Russia had a rich history of satirical journalism. In the 1770s, in the reign of Katherine the Great, an elite of intellectuals close to the court developed a new ‘aesopian’ language – deeply subversive to the enlightened autocracy – to express their opposition to the old regime. The satire of the court flourished until the shadow of revolution in Europe drove the Empress to suppress it. Again in the 1860s highly popular satirical journals sprang up, drawing consciously on their courtly predecessors to curse the Crimean War and Tsar Alexander II’s empty promises of reform. While populist revolutionaries went ‘to the people’ to make common causes with the peasants, radical journalist set out to collect folk-stories, popular sayings, soldiers’ songs and workers’ ballads. The old allegorical vocabulary was joined to the language of popular satire. By the 1870s these journals has been closed down, but this language was now part of the everyday speech. Satirical writing returned to the underground, where it flourished, rooted in popular protest, until 1905. It was then that satire achieved its full power.
Compare alien with Italian,
A springful of larks in a rolling
To make matters worse, the BPAI is boldly engaging in a form of "judicial activism" by increasingly issuing 101 rejections sua sponte. Worse still, the rationale underlying many of these rejections is based on cases that have been long overruled (In re Warmerdam, In re Schraeder, Freeman-Walter-Abele, etc.).
got a rather anally retentive pocket diary, I know they do mean much to many. As I write this, for instance, I’m able to note that on this day in 1954 Bill Haley recorded ‘Rock Around the Clock’, while three days later Doris Day had a number one with Secret Love. The birth of the rock/pop dichotomy perhaps? Nobody knows, and nobody should care, if you ask me. Time is time. It passes.
a new post about my Iphone.
My pages were not as aged as I wanted so I "aged" them with Tim Holts distress ink in walnut by dragging the ink pad around the edges and across the page a little.
For those who don’t know Wakefield, we have a new, all singing all dancing hospital. Its like a spaceship docking station with a W H Smith. On arrival, once you’ve passed the cloud of smoke – how can you have a fag with a drip in your arm? -You reach the self check-in desk. No really, you check in and the big screens tell you which gate to go to – no duty free on the way through though!!!
I found this song last night, when I was assembling a CD for my kid´s piano teacher. She´s an awesome lady in her 50´s, and we often meet, and when we meet, we can never stop talking. I made her a CD with all my heroes, and it was nice sitting here, after everyone was in bed, listening through my collection and going through the mental images related with the music. This song was given to me by one of our Couchsurfers, Haleigh, and I had never consciously listened to it, between all the Mumford and Sons and Regina Spektor music. Last night, I did. And I really liked it.
then today my brother was arrested and it made huge news...to much...its to much...I am so scared for him, and pretty pissed that he never considers anyone but himself when he does stupid shit... ugh its to much, I am not sure I can handle all of this, I am not sure what to do...
The scene where a hobo is confronted by a paddy wagon full of garishly made-up prostitutes was like watching the inner workings of my own perverted mind (I was particularly fond of Julie McQuain's stellar work as "Receptive Whore in Van"); and the many shots of Jane Arakawa and her yummy stems walking across the junkyard grounds were a sensuous tonic in the face of all the foulness that surrounded her.
“Who do you think it is?” asked George.
Hello all! Hope 2012 is treating you kindly, and if not, hope you are taking the situation in hand and whacking the wayward year upside the head with your jelly shot pan! And after all that pretty pretty talk, it's time for a topic change . . . to thoughts of love and smooching. To Valentines . . .
So silent, so vulnerable
Ribbon is also from paper studio
Send your entries on a Word document (double-spaced and 12 point text) to:
The letter is bold, and asks some genuinely courageous questions that will no doubt horrify some whilst delighting others. It has chosen to address, in a very direct way, that very kulturkampf outlined above, before asking what the response of the Diocese of Lancaster will be, both spiritually and constitutionally, to the goal of evangelisation.
I know that I am allowed no contact with a woman while she is in her period of menstrual uncleanliness – Lev.15:19- 24. The problem is, how do I tell? I have tried asking, but most women take offense.
04. Sunny - James Brown / 3:16
PARTY POOPERS!
*During your fussy/sleepy times at night I give you a pacifier, cradle you, and bounce you till you calm down.
"You idiot!" Sam's father yelled again, his skin mottled. "It could've gone off. What's the matter with you? God, I could kill you... if you hurt my daughters... haven't you done enough damage in your miserable life?" Sam and Abby stared at each other, astonished. Their father was always so gentle. He didn't even kill insects; he sucked them up in a special bug wand and released them outside.
lightbulb shaped bottles
Against such inhumane methods the Boers could not fight, and eventually the British succeeded in their dream of colonizing the entire Southern Africa in 1902, when the treaty of Vereeniging, ending the Second Anglo Boer War, was signed. Even in defeat, the Boers were recognized under international law.
He always has been my baby
After being drip-fed status updates from the techie all weekend (he seriously looked like a geek – long stringy beard, sandals, Harry-Potter glasses and a little body odour too, no kidding) – the laptop made an appearance back in the house very late Sunday afternoon.
I am feeling intellectually ashamed and it can be blamed on a video game and the advent of Internet memes.
This ranks right up there with going to the store in your jammies, walking around in your bunny slippers, women going "commando" and unfortunate public displays of Spandex.
Amy Carmichael offered no prizes. Why should a child receive a prize for what her patient teachers had given her? "The great reward was to be trusted with harder, more responsible work."
It also claimed that two senior Scotland Yard detectives investigating the phone hacking scandal held back: “Assistant Commissioners Andy Hayman and John Yates were both scared the News of the World would expose them for allegedly cheating on their wives if they asked difficult questions of the Sunday tabloid.”
Normally, white chocolate doesn't cut it. It's not even chocolate. It's made with cocoa butter, but not cocoa powder, so it has the texture of chocolate, but none of the flavor. The trick is coming up with a recipe that makes use of the ooey, gooey texture without relying on the taste.
Finally, I had one of those ugly blonde baskets that I hated but the shape was perfect. I diluted my French Linen chalk paint and painted the basket then added a French advertising graphic from the Graphic Fairy. Love it on top of this display piece. Now if I could just find the time and energy to get rid of that harlequin wall. It’s time for a change in the kitchen and dining areas!
Besides having the actual book at my disposal, the tactile contact is reassuring, a grounding in this plane. I think therein lies the rub. I find books real whereas e-books or I-tunes music or even Netflix, feels temporary to me. I’m not saying to give up on them, but I prefer a good old-fashioned hardcover book. Then again, maybe I’m just showing my age.
Soups and pasta dishes , things that go in the oven, like brownies or cookies.
There are many cities in all over the world which have a plethora of bars with various themes individuals can attend. Bar stools play key role to meet your seating needs in the bars or else in the restaurants. Purchasing these stools in bulk makes a chance for you to avail great discounts and best deals.
With the desire to understand her better and decipher her coded language, I began sending her anonymous postcards. Each containing only what she had spoken of during the previous night, as she slept. I hoped she would consult me, as I would have thought receiving these strange expressions and enigmatic verses would spark conversation. But no. She kept to herself. Nonetheless, she kept all of the postcards in a lunchbox from her elementary school days, the one with ALF on the cover that she had for years kept as a keepsake from the more memorable times of her past. She received so many postcards that she even had to use her other one, the one with Fozzie Bear from the Muppet Babies where tomatoes are being thrown at him while he’s on stage trying to make jokes. Wocka Wocka Wocka!
The top-seeded Moorestown High School girls tennis team did what it needed to do, sweeping the Kingsway girls across the board to win the South Jersey Group III championship Monday afternoon.
Beatles A day in the life UK
"Mommy, if you die before I do, I want to still keep you, because I just love you so much." (If that sounds morbid to you, keep in mind this is a four-year-old with very little knowledge of decay, etc., saying this.)
Yes, as a young boy, I almost fell out of a moving car. Of course, to say that I almost died is pretty dramatic.
We got to watch the Dead Car get picked up by a forklift, hauled off to be weighed, and taken off to parts unknown.
Bazzil Cardstock.
When I got there her mom (looked to be in her 80's or 90's) was standing at the stove. Embarrassed, I stammered, "Where's your daughter?"
Death is always "the end of the Earth" for those who die. Just this week 857 Porpoises were washed upon the shores of Peru. All dead. All running from something. I wonder about the ocean currents. I wonder about what monsters lurk in the deep blue darkness in the ocean's depths? What happens when you add a mixture to this soup?
The awesome video below could be a knock on everyone’s door to think openly, or it could be a smear campaign or propaganda to taint the current administration.
You maybe asking yourself, why I use transition songs such as, "Shout", "Sugar, Sugar", "All Star" and "Iko, Iko" to name some of the pop rock songs I use. Its because I enjoy the transition, the students enjoy the transition and the introduction of music that is something other than child-like is expanding to them. I have found their response time is quicker, they often recognize the tune because they may hear it on the radio with their families and it makes all of us happy because we dance as we transition ( the music just makes you want to dance.) I judiciously pick oldies and newer pop songs that have an upbeat and words.
For less than $100 I was able to pick up this nice stash of Christmas goodies, including table runners and placemats that were ridiculously reduced at Spotlight AND meters of fabric for Christmas activities I never got to do in 2011, including the Christmas canvas art.
the VERITAS Logo Reg. U.S. Pat. & Tm. Off. Other product names
We luved our Little Black Sambo. And luved our Auntcha Mama Pancakes with real butter and Auntcha Mama in her red-poked-dotted apron and her kerchief that matched. And that big grin that we all associated with delicious, yummy pancakes and maple syrup, ” From the clay we all came from to the wrong doin’ that led from time to time to a lynchin’ (actually the Forks never lynched nobody ‘cause this wasn’t the Deep South).
i could not help but remember
370 g soft light brown sugar
As the familiar characters walked, danced or rode by on floats I took it all in and got some great pictures. Watching a Disney parade is great fun but then it happened.
Parenting isn't easy. Life with four active, free-thinking sons is three-quarters chaos and one-quarter conflict, with the occasional cuddle thrown in for good measure. Don't get me wrong: they're good kids, and I'm a pretty good mom. But as you well know, parenting is continual process. You can't just tell your son, "Please be quiet in church" once and expect that he'll abide by that directive for the rest of his life. You have to say it again and again and again. You have to be willing to go to church on a semi-consistent basis with less-than-willing children. You have to somehow model restraint and proper behavior when what you really want to do is throttle the three-foot high person next to you. And you need to be prepared to issue consequences for unacceptable behavior, even though you know that stating said consequence will result in a brief escalation of an already unpleasant situation.
7 Goodbye to Love 5:30
We’d just come from Paris, Jonathan from 7 weeks of traveling all over Europe, Russia, and Kazakstan, and the others from Amsterdam, so there were lots of stories and experiences floating around, waiting to be shared. The entire US team was staying in the same place, so we also got to catch up a little with others like Brian (Hansen), Jonathan’s friend and longtime skating compeer.
Thanks for having me Megan!
1 steed
Irgens Å, Krüger, K, Skorve AH, Irgens LM. Birth defects and paternal occupational exposure: hypotheses tested in a record linkage based dataset. Acta Obstet Gynecol Scand 2000; 79: 465-70.
Outfit 1 - Eggplant + Chambray + Touch of Print
2. The very same day, a blogger friend who tells a story way better than I do DID THE SAME THING (but opposite) and she has visuals! I highly recommend you visit her similar post (Chelle at Coffee & Zombie Movies) immediately. I'm now referring to her as my awesome socially-impaired little sister.
Some swings go back and forth. Some go side to side. This one does both—and does it with music, toys, and delightful jungle style. With a seat designed for 180° rotation, allowing three swing directions, the Bright Starts™ Sunnyside Safari™ Plug in Sway & Swing™ uses our unique TrueSpeed™ technology to sense baby's weight and adjust for consistent speed—so it grows along with baby.
The imagination, however, is still its own realm. Like many authors, I’ve been on the road this last month, visiting the many schools who have been having their annual Book Week. (Why do they all choose March? But that’s another issue.)
He finds an address for the evergreen email account, and rushes there, finding his captor Woo jin (Ji-tae Yu) there with bodyguards. Woo jin tells him "You want to know what's going on. You want to know who I am. Come on, it's a game! First the who, and then I'll tell you why. If you figure it out, come see me anytime, I'll raise your score. You have until July 5th. Oh no, only 5 days left! Too short? Hang in there, if you succeed, I'll kill myself and not Mi-do." He adds "I will kill every girl that you love until the day that you die." Enraged by the taunting, Dae Su chokes Woo Jin, who tells his bodyguard not to intervene. Dae Su prepares to torture Woo Jin, but he reveals that he has a pacemaker in his chest with an off switch enabling him to kill himself at any time, which would prevent torture and Dae Su from getting any answers. Woo Jin and his bodyguard leave reminding him that he left Mi-do tied up and the door is unlocked. He rushes back to her place and finds the building manager there with some thugs. Mr. Park shows off some new teeth and he has Dae Su held down making preparations to extract his teeth. Park is surprised that rather than cower, Dae Su laughs. Before he's able to do anything, he gets a call telling him to leave. Dae Su tells Mr. park that he's going to chop off his hand for touching Mi Do's breast, but he is not able to follow them. Dae Su tells Mi Do some of the details of what happened.
amounting N200,000,000.00.”
Here are a few shots from our excursion:
Chronograph Urethane strap Aluminum case and bezel Approximately 45mm including the crown Date function 5ATM water resistant Red dial and band
And the world is at peace,
But when I read the feeble arguments of columnists like Brendan O’Neill and Toby Young calling the attack on Newscorp a politically motivated witch-hunt, I want to scream. That is no more than the ‘bad truth’ on the arse-side of the ‘good lie’ coin. The viewpoint of The Slog is crystal clear on this point, and for those who care to read About, it always has been: I think our entire UK, US and EU cultures suck. I’m bored by the lefts, rights, ins, outs and claims for absolute correctness on both sides. We need, bit by bit, to dismantle all the idiot pc, health & safety, welfare dependency, do what it takes, greedy, ethics-free business, anti-communitarian, Whips system, full-of-bollocks hypocrisy and controlling authoritarianism of everything that has happened under Heath, Callaghan, Thatcher, Major, Blair, Brown and Cameron.
- Cytopoetics doesn’t do “poetry time” … sharp means SHARP. If you’re not on the list by 8pm you won’t be slamming.
I've currently got six amazing projects in various stages of development which I can't wait to share with you guys, and recently wrapped a series of webisodes for NickMom called "Mom Shopping Network" which spoofs products created for mothers. Here's a peek at a few of my favorite spots:
We were scheduled to play Hythe Aztecs at Claypits Lane Sports Ground in Dibden. If ever anybody needs reminding where that is they are told something like, “You go past Staplewood, where Southampton train, then left at the round-about. You know, the one with good drainage,” and that will usually be enough to trigger a response like, “Yes, that's not a bad pitch. It has good drainage.”
Avoiding the glances of young men
perhaps it wasn’t the way you wanted and
For job seekers, make sure the most pertinent qualifications that you possess cut through the ringing noise in recruiters ears. Recruiters view stacks of resumes all with the same vomit-inducing Objective statement, managers interview dozens of interview-suited little punks like you, everyone has “strong communication skills” and a “track record of success.” Identify 3-5 SPECIFIC qualifications that you possess and keep going back to those themes. Lead your resume with these skills, work them into every response you give, and include references top them in the questions you ask. Amplify your argument to 11 by supporting your candidacy with a simple, straightforward case that’s based on behaviors, not clichés. What are you doing when you communicate strongly? What did you do to succeed? Describe those behaviors repeatedly to your audience to cut through the numbing buzz of applicant exhaust noise.
The festival this year was certainly different from previous years. This year's line-up provided an opportunity for attendees to really see the personalities chefs come to life during the demos. The hands-on events were definitely a crowd pleaser, and I thought the Meyer's hand washing station was just genius. A giant thank you goes out to C3 Presents and FOOD and WINE Magazine for inviting me out to enjoy the event. Also, a big thank you to KitchenAid for sponsoring my photographer's pass.
I don’t know how both statements appear in the original Spanish, but they are essentially alike that one cannot help but assume that Bolaño (or more precisely, the character named Bolaño, as told by a journalist named Cercas, in a book by the novelist Cercas), knowingly or unknowingly, appropriated a statement by Cervantes (or more accurately the narrator of the Quixote).
I am buying flowers. I am arranging them. I am making coffee. I am fighting with my boyfriend. I am lamenting the loss of a friend. I am talking to my mother. I am driving. I am digging a flower bed. I am checking email on my phone. I am feeling guilty. I am thinking about the end of the world. I am considering what to make for dinner.
Every Friday Mark Dillon
The apostle Paul is speaking to a great crowd of Jews in Jerusalem and recounting his conversion from Judaism to Christ.
I preferred Viviano's. It feels like a relic from the 1950s, slightly dingy and crammed to the brim with products. Fifty kinds of olive oil? Check. Twenty varieties of fresh ravioli? Check. A cheese and meat counter with a sassy counterman who knows every olive, meat and cheese in his area? Check. It isn't as organized or as well-lit as DiGregorio's, but I loved the chaos of it.
6. What is a cause near and dear to your heart?
When they arrived in the Waterberg district they discovered a strong-flowing river running northwards. The vegetation in the area was lavish green with plenty of game roaming about. The setting was perfect! This small group of peace-loving and God-fearing people decided there-and-then that they were not travelling further northwards; --- they had found their “Promised Land”! The river and the town they established was named Nylstroom (The Nile Stream --- NOT the Nile River). The story that these people made a navigational error and mistook the nearby lonesome mountain (Kranskop) as a pyramid is also total hogwash.
In the second part of the evening the prominent Irish female poets and writers will read Szymboska’s poems in the English translation. Polish version of the poems will be also presented. Where available we will use the recordings of Szymborska reading her own works.
1 cup plain yogurt
Amy Winehouse is dead - and that's tragic, but also a bit immaterial for me, because on the one hand I never heard much of her and her music in the first place and on the other hand you could argue cynically that she was dead years ago. But everyone is talking about it and this will not change till the next big pop-news comes along, if this hasn't already happened. The real tragedy is rather the age in which she died.
Comer, among the speakers at the Lexington seminar, said most Kentucky farmers have the equipment needed to produce hemp. He added that the crop needs no herbicides or pesticides, a plus for the environment and a cost savings for producers.
Goodies Used:La Pashe decoupage sheet , papers from stash think memory box dew drops and corner punch.
Anyway, I’m in my busiest time of the year now, so I doubt I’ll do another public session anytime soon. But it turned out to be another great way to spend one day of a long weekend.
“Nay, ‘tis we who are early,” Ewan said, dismissing her apology with a wave of his hand. “Thee art most becoming in thy riding habit.”
"There's a newbie on the beach little Moon,
In a world increasingly prone to stunt instrumentalism and ever quickening pace, Bombino’s sincerity and authenticity shines. Sometimes the best tempos are the ones you can just close your eyes and nod along to. Sometimes the best notes are the ones you decide not to play.
I also like his emphasis on the importance of having a support culture in your critical reflection, that teaching should be something that is talked about and worked on just like we expect our students to talk about their learning and academic work. The sense of a learning community among teachers very much appealed to me, although Brookfield is quick to point out that there are severe risks involved in becoming sufficiently vulnerable to engage in significant conversations about this sort of stuff. You have to admit you’ve done things wrong, or are confused about a dynamic in your classroom, or don’t know what to do in a certain situation. In certain academic cultures, that’s the blood in the water. Critical reflection is a dangerous thing, because it rocks the boat – which is why you need a trusted community to be part of.
The size of the rectangle will determine the size of your crown.
Those who are aware and have been keeping themselves up to date with violence, crime and murders would know that the number of murders have greatly increased since June, and actually started in April already.
As you neared the record, Jack and I would check the sports page every morning to see if you recorded another save. We were both looking forward with great anticipation to the day you would break the record.
11. Kai is positioned as the Main Dancer, and included in the subgroup of EXO-K.
Given my love of Cabot Extra Sharp Cheddar, you will find it very ironic, then, that one of the modifications I made to this recipe is to use Smoked Gouda instead of the cheddar. That doesn't mean I don't love the original! I do love it!!! And highly recommend it. I just wanted to try a different twist. And the Smoked Gouda version is fab, too ... If I do say so myself.
Even though we have no less than five sets of currency in circulation – the
4. If I reach 300 followers during this giveaway, I will draw a second number and that person will also get a surprise gift. It is a surprise because even I don't know what it will be yet. :)
such glory as yours for such humble estate!’
Their injuries that suggested they had suffered ‘multiple lacerations’ and ‘blunt trauma’ according to the police report.
Additionally, it can make for awkward watercooler conversation. I learned the hard way to append the phrase “the entry for” to any answer I gave to the question, “What are you working on?” (“Fucking. UH WHOA I MEAN…”)
And that’s what we get – a good film. At 89 minutes long it flows well from scene to scene, everything makes sense within the confines of the story and it keeps the viewer captivated throughout.
I am sad that our educational system has not evolved enough that we still consider "special education" classes as somehow 'less' than regular education. Kids of all ability levels deserve a classroom that fits their needs, and those classrooms should NEVER be counted as "less": than the regular ed programs. I wish with all my heart, I could change that perception.
It has nevertheless been used to justify beliefs and policies, for example, in his letter to the two members of the House of Lords, Douglas Fraser quotes the following:
Reflected in cracked mirrors
“Aaaaargh.” Said Obadiah. And then he said, “I don’t know. Please. Stop.”
While in Kentucky, Myers taught under a different name, Tericka Dye.
6 Tbs. olive oil
To get a nice end result the edges must not leak. I reinforced a few of my edges with masking tape.
And always has been.
Republicans envision an administration in which Romney has relegated himself to a kind of head-of-state role, at least domestically, with Ryan as the actual head of government. Read the rest of Chait's piece. It's worthwhile. One consistant element emerging from every dissection I read of Ryan's plan is consistent was pinpointed by Ezra Klein last year, comparing the Simpson-Bowles deficit reduction plan to the Paul Ryan version:
Subject line should include GarbageBarge 2012 Submission_ Your Name Email you submission to:
And then I get to go back to making people afraid of what's in their closets...
This being our first year in England, not sure how much of this is normal and how much is just luck (good or bad) that it didn’t rain much for January and February but started raining in late March and hasn’t stopped really. I’m hoping that there isn’t a drought and that we will not get an official notice not to use our hosepipe but should that happen, I have my water butts before I start hauling water out of the house. I’m good to go.
Thank you, Mona.
This was all quite thrilling, someone actually saying what they really think about me, a dream come true.
There are several childhood memories that I would like to erase. I’ve tried two years of talk therapy and many years of medication to escape these memories but they’re still haunting me; however, if my bad memories are erased, what will form? This idea was expanded on in the movie “Eternal Sunshine Of The Spotless Mind.”
Following up on something from yesterday, I guess Mother and Father Goose in the long back pond did get a head start on most of the rest of the geese. I watched a territorial squabble in the center pond yesterday, saw a major gander fight last night while driving for work, and a Facebook friend has posted several photos of geese fighting in her area. I never knew geese to be so violent, the pair I saw from the truck last night got a running start at each other, then body slammed themselves into their opponent. If I had known what was coming, I would have stopped the truck, I just happened to have taken my point and shoot with me.
Reading(Phonics)
In case you’re under initiation from a guru or set of teachers, you should exercise extreme care in sharing information that you receive or your very own experiences of initiation. You might be squealing out information so carelessly that, once spied on by a Dark being, your own initiation can be jeopardized.
Secrets of a One-Match Fireplace Fire
This is a fun easy doll, with a wonderful result."
Now it’s time for some drilling and magnet gluing… always a bit of a pain. Anyway, I glued a magnet on the neck position, one on each shoulder (on the arms side of course), and the right arm needed to get two magnets, one to attach to the shoulder (so keep your polarities correct!) and the other for the right-hands-with-huge-axes pieces. You are able now to check how those heads fit and even how the axe hands work on the right arm.
I mean seriously…this is the kind of writing M. Night Shyamalan and Tommy Wiseau only dream of. This is the omega-pointless. The be-all-end-all of nonsensical plot threads. And hey, how about the fact that we already know that nothing of any consequence is going to happen in this present-day time period, being that we’ve already seen the future? TRY HARDER TO HAVE A GODDAMN POINT, MOVIE. This whole thing is like a wild goose chase in search for meaningful plots.
Slowly but surely, I've developed a fascination with the Olsen's Elizabeth and James. And while items from their pricier, The Row, fall into the wish category, E&J pieces are a definite want—especially with my birthday next month.
When I was trying to choose which trees to highlight in my final post on the Noelanders Trophy the other day, it struck me just how many of the bonsai in the show there were that had been created from Pinus sylvestris and were already outstanding trees. It is interesting to speculate about just how many great bonsai that there will be in the future that have come from native European tree species . So here lets look at just a few Scots pines, to use the English vernacular name, that already fit the description of ‘ great ‘.
Books: .50 each, $4
As said I was in the neighborhood. According to my phone it looked very close by so I asked again.
Dear Diary, I have not forgotten about you, though it may appear so.
“My bonny lies over the ocean
“I know what you are.” He raised the .38 to my chest. “Put down the cutter.”
“… It was agreed, that my endeavours should be directed to persons and characters supernatural, or at least romantic, yet so as to transfer from our inward nature a human interest and a semblance of truth sufficient to procure for these shadows of imagination that willing suspension of disbelief for the moment, which constitutes poetic faith. Mr. Wordsworth on the other hand was to propose to himself as his object, to give the charm of novelty to things of every day, and to excite a feeling analogous to the supernatural, by awakening the mind’s attention from the lethargy of custom, and directing it to the loveliness and the wonders of the world before us …”
Mann makes his most evocative case when he describes the few works of pre-contact philosophy, poetry, and science that survive. Citing a poem about the power of art to transcend mortality, a theme completely familiar to poets in Europe and Asia, Mann contemplates the enormity of the loss to world culture when an entire hemisphere’s history of thought was wiped out virtually overnight:
Cook pasta according to package directions. I used Colavita Mini Shells, boiled them in salted water for 7 minutes. Drain and drizzle a little oil in to keep them from sticking.
Typically most teams follow the same set up for the front suspension in terms of the placement of the rockers, torsion bars, dampers anti roll bars and heave elements. As unlike with rear suspension, the raised front end almost dictates a pushrod set up in order to the get the correct installation angle of the pushrod. However the McLaren antiroll bar shows there is some variation in comparison to the norm and also highlights Ferraris similar thinking in this area.
Sure beats putting every detail of my life as facebook status updates though, right?
A new voting regime!
The Siberia is fab, I'm really pleased, it was spicy peach on the nose, a tiny bit sour, pleasingly spicy and orangey on the palate and absolutely bone dry, it's lush! :)
Until then, it's work, work, work. Plus a meeting with the middle school leader at church & a family get-together this weekend. Its going to be fun but I hope it goes by fast 'cause I'm to see my family. :)
I was 32 when I started identifiying as transgender. I changed my identifcation on my drivers liscense and social security card—trying to pass as female was more difficult than just identifying as male. So I just changed my clothes.
In my chemo-mother-approaching senior brain, that mat is so many things to me. So many things that by the grace of God and the gift of His mercy, I have overcome. But here's the rub, I still find myself wanting to sit back down on it, going back to thoughts and ways of thinking that don't give witness to what He's done in me.
When I was growing up, I loved fairy tales. The interesting thing, however, is that I wasn’t always so keen on the happy endings or princesses getting their happily-ever-after. Those were not the reasons I read the stories. It was more like me reveling in some dark, magical world that felt so different from my own, but real at the same time.
Luke 22:61-62
Saturday was our anniversary. We had a meal on Shanklin seafront. We sat on a table next to the most selfconciously cool couple ever. They looked quite old enough to know better ... early 30's maybe & were of the I've been to parts of the world where only seasoned travellers go ... kind of sophisticated hippy types. It must have been a 1st date or just friends trying to impress each other as they shared lots of info on where they had been, what they'd drunk & eaten etc and everything was .... rare, special ... "I have to take you to this restaurant, you'll love it , you go to XXXX & theres this path that not many people know about & you walk down a steep cliff & there just this shack yeah & you wouldn't even know it was a restaurant unless you KNOW yeah & they ONLY searve what they've caught that day. It might be anything .... (Fish wise) ... you can't ask for what you want yeah you have what they've caught". They had a massive overflowing ashtray on a non-smoking veranda as they were friends of the manager (of course!) & were joined by one of the other managerial staff for a really pretentious chat about how you couldn't beat lebanease wines. FFS!
On This Page
The area where I live – Aberdeenshire in Scotland – contains quite a diverse landscape. There is a huge variety of flora and fauna, geology and agricultural activity. There are also quite a few castles.
As Catholic scholar George Weigel points out, the document not only tackles the so-called HHS contraception mandate, it highlights “state laws that impede the Church’s service to immigrants, attempts by state legislatures to turn religious communities into bureaus of state government, discrimination against Christian students on university campuses, and restrictions on the Church’s capacity to draw on public funds in its service to orphans and victims of human trafficking.”
Have enough to be ready, but not enough to end up on 'A&E' with that psychiatrist with the huge forehead (Dr. Fivehead, as she is called in our household). Or just rob an Extreme Couponer. Have you seen those stockpiles? That’s a lot of green beans.
Rob Swann, co-driven by Darren Garrod, drove a perfect rally in sunny Barbados, beating the locals and taking a well deserved Production class win and finishing ninth overall in his Subaru Impreza N14 on his third visit to the island! It’s nice to take the win as the competition was very tough this year! I haven’t driven on tarmac since this rally 12 months ago and so was a bit rusty. Once again the organisers were brilliant and it is a lot of fun to rally in front of such passionate fans!
OK, there you go.
Maybe that means getting a personal trainer to show you around the gym.
Duties (But not restricted to):
For Webopedia:
MesAyah
Didn’t Roodal, the Leader of Govt Buffoonery say in parliament that Ms Newton travelled with you as a nurse, (again under privileges…..this man does real abuse this thing, oui.)? Why are we now hearing that your sister is not a registered nurse in either Trinidad or the UK? What happen with that? Was it a lie?
shredded mozzerella cheese
Had she not given a moment’s thought to him?
Since I got such awesome feedback from the first post I wrote To Grace, I decided to write a part two. Who knows…this could just be the beginning of posts I write out to kids who have CP just like me. But this “letter” in a sense is simply reflecting on what I have gone through while having CP. By addressing it to Grace, I am connecting with someone I know personally who also has CP. However, this can apply to anyone who has CP, so I’ve decided to not include a “To:” line, and instead, I’ll just jump right in.
The cure? A gluten-free diet for life. That’s the good news. As soon as gluten is removed from the diet, the body begins to heal. In children, this healing process can be dramatic, often within six months. In adults, the healing takes time. According to the Celiac Sprue Association, celiacs may require up to a year to heal, sometimes two, depending on the severity of the damage.
And this: I honestly don't know what Stearns's vision in Golden Town is about, but the presence of a vision is clear. For all the associations in his notes, Stearns keeps things cryptic and elusive, and that seems to me to be a strength here, because all the private and disturbing elements that do come across suggest that I ought not be so sure that I would even want to know what it's all about. But I do know that there is a way of listening, just letting it intrude into your own waking dreams, that I find well worth the while.
It was not till two hours after this that Alice began to tire. She thought that it must be around noon at least, although looking above to see how the light had changed she remained unaware as the trees still admitted no sunlight, or any light it seemed. The eerie, dim light had a green tinge to it that made it seem that it came directly from the trees themselves, as if each one were a part of a sun that lit the forest.
As much as we love the Royal Futura, it doesn't have the precision of an Olympia. The fit and finish are to a noticeably lower standard. However, it's still a nice typing machine and is just generally more laid back. It is almost quiet enough for night typing unlike the staccato Olympia SM3s. The Futura is more beach bum than jet set executive.
As I lay in bed last night, my head and heart couldn't stop thinking about what that moment must have been like for her. I couldn't stop wondering about the day and how it felt and how she would be able to get through that horrible day and have to face the next one.
So instead, I'm going to share my opinions on the book I downloaded for the 4 hour drive up to NYC this weekend - 50 Shades of Grey by E.L. James.
It's tempting to just let that stand as the whole of this post -- and it would be good enough! -- but I didn't realize that he's also writing a column for a website called London Loves Business, and when he posted a link to one on Facebook, I started reading back through them, and came to this one: Step aside craft beer, it's time for our "session beers" to shine. Please, go read it and come back for a discussion. I'll wait here.
Had known it since HIS name made it's way into my eardrums, courtesy of a well meaning co worker behind me........
Hmm...I just got a great idea at this typing. I think I'll take some of my favorite lyrics and apply them to ATCs
You might already know that I am a glasses junkie... eyeglasses and sunglasses... I think that came from the French... they love eyewear almost as much as they love fragrance and a well stocked pharmacy....
- vocation
Some of you have been dealing with this for decades. I want to hear from you!
When I spotted that second image of a closed and derelict post office I couldn't help thinking of the stonemason who carved the date above the windows in the belief that here was a building that would last the torrents of time. But it is perhaps the third image that encapsulates Thornton for me : the steep hills, the cobbled streets, the wonderful houses.
**important background information** I scream when I am startled ... can't help it; it's just a reaction with me
Your grandson "reupped" for another tour in the Marines and is being sent to Japan for three years next month. They packed up their house and are waiting for those orders to come through so they may visit Sacramento one last time before the new tour.
I finally got my high schoolers to help write a Christmas pageant, but getting them to narrate it to a room full of people turned out to be quite a different story. The DRE looked at me with some concern on Sunday morning and said, “We’ll definitely need microphones for the performance.” Oh well, one small step at a time.
As I headed back, I could see Remy, who always manages to find the softest, muddiest, wettest spots, knee deep in the stream, reaching over for some succulent something or other.
Additional items in the main pocket waterproof sack include a small hand towel and a personal hygiene and Doctor Bronner's Organic soap, which is really rather "hippy-dippy" of me, but I like the soap, and it can fill the role of soap, dentrifice, and shaving lotion, all in one), two rolls of toilet paper, a sewing/repair kit (assorted fabric and glover's needles, dental floss and fishing line, and flat-packed
Alameda County Superior Court Judge Frank Roesch has given the state attorneys one week to draft a brief to persuade him that the Department of Pesticide Regulation is not required to follow the California Environmental Quality Act, which would have allowed them to propose methyl iodide as an option without providing an alternative option. Earthjustice lawyers will then have a week to respond. The ruling will likely not be based on the mountain of scientific data showing the dangers of methyl iodide on human health, but rather it will likely be based on a process technicality. In this case, that means including alternatives to methyl iodide or proposing to approve the chemical at more conservative exposure levels. The judge will issue a final ruling on whether the state violated California law sometime in February.
Alfred Hitchcock employs seemingly simple camera angles and restrained cutting to present a scene that is not merely a showpiece of suspense, as what he is usually known for, but uses cinematic language that comments on how we can't trust what we see with our own eyes.
I spent hours and hours at Edinburgh zoo sketching and photographing the tigers. I had pages and pages of drawings and sketches that I used to create Augustus, and the internet came in very handy.
These kinds of novelties are vital because the brain has evolved for efficiency and routinely takes perceptual shortcuts to save energy; perceiving information in the usual way requires little of it. Only by forcing our brains to recategorize information and move beyond our habitual thinking patterns can we begin to imagine truly novel alternatives. It also helps us to get less atrophy of the brain and can stimulate intelligence, loosen our mind and keep senior moments away (always a plus).
As you can see, things have changed in new and terrible ways. Much like the rest of the crap that inspired What the Effmas to begin with:
Nicholas K. Akins, chief executive of Ohio-based AEP, said the company plans to retire 5 of its 25 coal-burning plants and shut down coal-powered units at other plants it owns in a shift that collectively means the elimination of about 5,000 megawatts of capacity. The result will be that by 2020, only about half of the power AEP produces will come from coal, down from about 67 percent last year.
Attorney Christian: God has spoken to us: it is called the holy Bible. Goo, it is you that needs to think. But you won’t. It is an impossible thing for you to do. And it is you that tells children there is no healing no hope for them. It is you who tells them that there is no heaven wating for them if they do die. You are the culprit here, not the Creationists who offer hope to a dysfunctional world.
A view from the highest point of Swihart's orchard, looking north(ish). Mt Adams, one of the Double Mountains (Hood is the other) is hiding behind the clouds.
Sorry, today's entry is kinda boring, too serious.lol
“She’s not my friend anymore. She’s not inviting me to her birthday party – not that I want to go anyway, just so she can show off with her endless collection of toys.”
The good ladies of 1885 would no doubt be horrified if they could see what the walking group wears, wouldn't they? But on the other hand, perhaps they would be envious - it's probably easier to stride out in current clothing than in the skirts, petticoats and corsets of those times.
However, as well as generally spoiling the spring for many British residents, there are now serious dangers of water contamination as the deluge flushes raw sewage into rivers and coastal waters.
I’m currently loving John Mark McMillan’s new album, “Economy.” All the songs on it are great.
Five dollars for powdered mix and some cups,
Toluca Valley-style Salsa de Venas
So as not to be disappointed Justin and I decided to not read up much about the trail, nor had we looked at many photos. And we were not disappointed! The bus picked us up at 6:00 am and we headed for the town of Ollantaytambo. Here we ate breakfast and got pestered by the local women until we bought ponchos and sticks. Then we continued in the bus for another 30 minutes until we came to Km 82, the start of the Inca Trail. Packing up our things there was a sense of anxiousness, yet excitement in the air. The Inca Trail is the top activity to do in South America and you have to book it at least two months in advance, so this was a big moment for everyone. We were also walking the trail in the rainy season, but luck was in our favour and the day we started there were bright blue skies and the sun was shining down. After about 15 minutes the group was ready and the porters (chaskeys, which means messenger in Quechua) had loaded themselves up like donkeys. They are truly amazing. You read reviews about how strong they are, but it´s not till you see them carry a load probably as heavy as person and literally run by you do you realize their strength. There are actually three different trails to Machu Picchu; The sacred trail for the pilgrims, the commercial trail to transport food and other goods, and the military trail to transport messages between the rulers. We were walking on the sacred trail.
One way to avoiding this task saturation was to assign each escort a limited sector to plot, so more fighter control teams were available to plot more interceptions. A master plot of the total air picture was maintained on the force flagship on a Plexiglas board. The pickets would call in information via voice radio. Don’t forget, every bit as important as tracking and plotting enemy air was tracking and plotting friendly aircraft. Only by continuously tracking every airborne contact could a task force be reasonably certain that every enemy raid would be intercepted or taken under anti-aircraft fire by escorts. Further, by plotting the location of friendly combat air patrols, fighter direction officers would know the best CAP to task to intercept a given raid.
I love my younger sister.
14. Bottom Line
33 Dark Day - Second Warning
Happy Thursday Everyone!!!
What is your favorite song and why?
The heroine, Andrea, offers him a croissant, which he sees as being like‘...like a large, fat grub with a ridged body…’ He dislikes its yeasty smell. At home in the 16th Century, on what is now the Scottish- English border, he would have eaten rye bread, oatcakes or flatbread, which was rather like crispbread and could be stored by stringing it from ceilings. Research brought home to me how restricted food was, in the past, by locality and season. Per eats oats and rye, because that was the grain best suited to the north before the agricultural revolution.
Necklace – House of Rain - Vapor (The WGD Nightstalker Hunt)
The nest box event will be very popular with educational school trips as Noah’s Ark holds the Quality Badge from the national ‘Learning Outside the Classroom’ scheme.
I made today's card earlier this week but I have been having trouble photographing it.
Advance tickets cost $35. Tickets at the door are $65.
Well, I confirmed it. I actually had received an e-mail (I get account balance e-mails every day, so I probably just missed that it was something else).
In addition, the sector contributed a total of RM37.4bil to the Gross National Income (GNI) of the country.
People with fixed mindsets are like the mud puddle. They were taught by authority figures that their genes, family, education and environment have determined their destiny, and they, like the atom, just are. Many of them were taught that they are not creative. Consequently, they believe they are a certain kind of person and there is not much they can do to change that. They might be able change some small things but the important part of who they are can’t be changed.
Bokwa Fitness, Mondays 5.30pm-6.30pm at Wolfe Road Healthy Living Centre – new dance fitness craze based around steps and kickboxing with a South African Vibe. Cost: FREE Contact: Scott Antcliffe, Foxhill Forum – 0114 231 5522
Social Butterfly
I made the following items:
- Hearing stories the next day about the night before
with the truth of God's word that has the power to transform our hearts.
This blog entry has been part of a self-experiment by Rafael Bienia. The fictional character Wilhelm Stuck is a live-action role-playing character of the author. The letters or blog entries of fractal snakes are somewhat an inner dialogue of someone projected into the past with some ideas about what will happen in the future. For further information, please read the introduction.
When a Vermont pastor's father became deathly ill, the pastor called the Green Mountain Baptist Association. Like many pastors in the state, he works another job to make ends meet. Unable to pay for the long trip home to be near his father, he needed compassionate counsel from a trusted colleague in ministry.
Come on outside, It's a lovely day
5.
Both things things happened around the same time, 1997. First, the movie Titanic came out--and like much of America--the movie captured my attention. Yes, there was a love story, but the ship of dreams fascinated me even more. I checked out many books at the library and bought others on the Titanic. I didn't think of writing a novel about it. At the time the only thing I was getting published was parenting articles. Still, I carried a love inside for that amazing ship and its passengers.
I've added one more way to win!!
He’s recently separated
“used to denote the shared soteriological beliefs of persons who reagard John Calvin (1509-1564) of Geneva as the greatest organizer and purveyor of biblical truth during the Protestant Reformation. Calvinism is that theology which emphasizes God’s absolute sovereignty as the all-determining reality, especially with regards to salvation. Most classical or high Calvinists agree that human beings are totally depraved (helpless to do anything spiritually good, including excercising a good will towardGod), unconditionally elected (predestined) to either salvation or damnation (although many Calvinists reject Calvin’s “horrible decree’ of reprobation), that Christ’s atoning death on the cross was meant only for the elect…Calvinism is the soteriological system stemming from Calvin, which is generally known under the rubric of TULIP (Total depravity,Unconditional election, Limited atonement,Irresistible grace, Perseverance of the saints).”
This means more materials and staffing are needed for public libraries (whose budgets are also being challenged across the country) and they often lack the curriculum-related materials the students need. In addition, one of the greatest effects on the public library from underfunded school libraries is the demand from school librarians themselves and classroom teachers for materials to use in the classroom.
Point in case, This morning I was going to a school to meet teach three classes and meet a new teacher with whom I would be working with from now on. I experienced some amount of stress and fear, not only because of the fact that I did not know anything about this new teacher, but also, and here’s the problem, because I knew she was Japanese and I assumed she might fulfill a horrible and terrifying stereotype I have heard of (but not experienced). The stereotype is a “Japanese teacher who regards an ALT (foreign language assistant teacher and native speaker) as a pronunciation recorder, disregarding their unique personality and array of skills.”
With what’s going on right now in Yemen, Jordan, Syria, Tunis and Egypt, I get a lot of questions about how Saudis are taking it and what’s the reaction. The short answer is they are shocked and captivated but haven’t made up their minds about any of it.
President Obama today announced that he now supports same-sex marriage, reversing his longstanding opposition amid growing pressure from the Democratic base and even his own vice president.
The whole meal ended up excellent and included Emily getting completely covered with lobster fat while cracking a claw for her fiance Nate. That upstaged the meal as the highlight of the evening for everyone but Emyo.
and it gives me great joy when you want to do that with me
I'm glad to be back. Thrilled to be in America. Often miss Geneva. So thankful for every, single moment had there (even scooterman, well,,,!)
to keep the car park neat and tidy.
I took a bunch of pictures on Sunday for one of my dad of one of his rental houses bright and early and as soon as I got home, I sat my butt on the couch and didn't get up until almost 3pm! It was just too comfy! Lola and I headed out for an afternoon of shopping at our favorite spots - Target and Old Navy! We are happiest when we shop.
First off, mortality is swallowed up by the transformation incurred via resurrection. Resurrection is the process of the transformation and the enlivening and the means by which the mortal body is swallowed up.
I love fresh starts, new beginnings, clean slates and alla that. I love shiny happy hopeful opportunities, inspirational quotes, and the like. So when I wake up tomorrow, hungover or not, I will remember that I have 365 days, 52 weeks, 12 months, or however you like to look at it, all clean and blank and stretched out before me to make amazing. Before I snarl at anyone and bitch and moan about how bad I may or may not feel, I will lay in bed and remember that it's a new day and a new year and it will be as awesome and amazing I allow it to be.
For cupcakes: Set onto freshly piped frosting.
Only a few weeks ago, here in Luxembourg, the EU Council of Ministers agreed on a common European approach to key elements of the Internet governance debate. Some of these relate directly to the various stakeholders assembled in Luxembourg now under the ICANN banner.
And we’re doin it we can’t be beat
Charity collecting boxes need to attract the attention of potential donors. Some do so by their location, placed strategically next to a till for example; others have novelty shapes and bright colours; while a few offer some small piece of entertainment in return for your coin. The latter tactic is far older than you might expect.
I'm torn between wanting to be at work, where the avalanche of back-log threatens to topple, and only the business staff are present. There is plenty to choose from, plenty that needs to be done before we go on break for a week. And there are plenty of people with less to do who wish they were on vacation and therefore plenty of conversations to be had. So - distraction aplenty.
It's time for a new challenge at Scrappy Moms Stamps. The theme is Summer Vacation....we want to see all your summer themed projects.
Dar al-Hijrah Islamic Center in Falls Church, Va., is a known breeding ground for terrorists, including:
Rhiannon Lassiter got her first, two-book, contract when she was nineteen and I know this because it was just a year after we had delivered her to Oxford University. Rhiannon is my daughter and is just seeing her fourteenth book published. It is a tribute to her writing that I forget this fact after a paragraph or two and just read her books as if they were by someone I had never met.
None of these practices are exclusive to the communities in which they are practiced. I can think of an Indian counterpart to each of these systems that operate similarly, if not identically. What distinguishes these traditions from those practiced in origin countries is that they have been successfully adapted in a country that does not mix friends and money, that prides itself on being self-reliant, that frowns on parental interference in one’s love life, that shudders at the parenting practices (often humorously) suggested by the Tiger Mother, that disdains living with one’s parents when one is an adult, that is mostly roads and cars, and take-out food and TV dinners (generalizations, that needn’t always be true).
Hope you have a great weekend and don't forget to watch The Junk Gypsies tomorrow on HGTV.
--the quality and cost of health care
Ail ou radis ?
“It’s the largest diamond in the world.”
I felt much better during today’s run compared to yesterday. I was sure to have three hours between my last meal and my run today. Today’s run was on the Little Blue Trace Trail in Independence. It was a beautiful evening to run, although it is definitely starting to warm up now.
8. Long wait times and no apology and/or rushing the patient once coming in. While no patients want to wait long, they will generally accept the wait time if they are pleased with the care you provide, or if it the initial visit, know that you have a good reputation. However, if the patient waits long and you then walk in and do not acknowledge the wait, explain why there was a wait, and apologize for the wait, it will significantly aggravate the patient. Rush the patient after a long wait and no apology and it will worsen the situation further.
This is the delirium of sickness. I dream about my reality -- about picking and dropping kids. Infinite loops of school ballet swimming friends birthdays play dates care love baths. I need a drink of water. In fact I have finished drinking a whole jug of ORS that magically appeared in my fridge by orders of S who is in the boondocks of country. I know it helps me to know it is he who remote controls my path to wellness, from two hundred miles away, and not my mother. My mother is just a child. When I was eight, I told my mother there was a man outside the gate on a motorcycle, and his private parts were outside his pant zip and he muttered something. She was so upset, she went red, and gave me instructions. After that, this recurring dream, in fevers, of a tiger chasing me, and me running, running from Sadiq Store, short cut through Lucky House, locking the gate shut just in the nick of time. Saved from hungry fangs, and breathless. That and the ticking, growing bomb.
God is asking you something today and my question to you and myself is WHY NOT ???
Carrots (organic): $1.98/2 lb bag, used 1/4 = $.50
In addition to the two Japanese distilleries, Nikka owns the Ben Nevis distillery in Scotland.
(If you're wondering: The first time I printed it I found it too small, and then reprinted on the same side instead of backside by accident. Didn't want to waste more so just highlighted the one I wanted and continued.)
Getting someone to open an email, become interested in a new product and ultimately buy is not an easy feat. In this article, we’ll go over a few tips for writing emails leading up to a launch, including tips for writing emails to other people’s (JV partners’ and affiliates’) lists.
But wouldn't you know it...
To face, all afraid,
- push your lil car, chair, daddy's cooler and use it as a walker
No one dies in that explosion, but with that telephone call to the television station the killer starts on his killing spree.
We had a wonderful time in Antigua at Veronica and John's wedding. The friends of the bride and groom stayed in these four casitas with adjoining courtyard. We were treated to a homemade breakfast in house each day, then spent our days exploring, visiting the local sites and hanging around the pool. The town is a maze of cobblestone streets, peppered with antique churches and surrounded by volcanoes. The guys were lucky to see a volcano erupt smoke while they were on the golf course.
Its all corporate greed over oil. If we didnt have any oil, no one would bother us but we are blessed with its wealth and cursed with its greed. Whether we have a democratic government, it wont make a difference at all. People will still try to take control of our lands because they want to control our oil and frankly, I would rather see royal families taking over who are wealthy already than have a greedy new comer step into power and hand over power to another country who pays more money (ie Iran and Iraq). But Bahrain has little to no oil left but it also shares a massive bridge with saudi arabia and an Iranian control of Bahrain could mean an Iranian threat to Saudi Arabia. You have to be blind not to notice the Iranian influence in Bahrain (Isa Qassim, Ali Salman).
Remember how I set out to shop smarter this year and with a budget in mind? Ya, so far the plan isn't working. Time to set boundaries. Publicly. Now I'll be held accountable. Here's what I have in mind:
trait is to be true
I recently bought the Tim Holtz distressing tool and used it to rough up the edges of the BasicGrey papers, then created some faux stitches with my piercing bug and white UniBall pen (also brand new, been doing quite the shopping lately). I am also considering buying Ingvild Bolme's distressing tool, looks awesome. Would love to try it out.
Favorite groom's shoe?
On-Page search engine optimization (SEO) is certainly an important part of the website building process. If you want to show up on the first page of any search engine’s search results, on-page SEO is a must. Logical Mix outlines the 3 most crucial elements needed to improve your on-page search engine optimization.
Now you might think that running a 30km technical trail, complete with brutal hills and sand slogging, six days after a marathon is not such a good idea for a middle aged office worker. Well, you'd be right. I felt tired at the start line, shattered by about 20km, and was shuffling pathetically for the last few kilometres - but I made it to the finish line.
In SparkPeople it asks what were my childhood dreams.
The Green Growth events is a great series for entrepreneurs wanting to be exposed to ways to succeed in business. Next week the session is looking at marketing. I hope everyone that attended the series is able to go away and set up one of the next successful eco-businesses.
My mom's dresser also used to have a large, full-length mirror but we broke it when we moved in this apartment in 2006. I kept the frame of the mirror also made of solid mahogany, and even if my mother is nagging me to get rid of it, I won't budge: I'll keep it. You can see it tucked behind the dresser.
The ATM only gets used in an emergency, and only when the cost of the fee is about the same as fuel costs to make a special trip to the credit union to withdraw cash.
walking through the MAZE
Of course, anything that can be monetized also can be collateralized, and such financial instruments must be rated for investors. David’s way ahead of you: “Obviously souls of politicians and Mormon Elders would not be investment grade.”
Preheat oven to 325 °F. Line muffin tin with paper or foil liners.
(21) 1 package of bubbles + bubble blower
Gerber, R. (2001). Vibrational medicine: The #1 handbook of subtle-energy therapies. Rochester, VT: Bear & Company.
OUTSTANDING ORDERS as of End of Day 11/30/2010 settled by End of Day 12/31/2010
The customer walked into the fast food restaurant yelling and screaming about poor service after pulling out of the drive through.
That is what I've been up to lately. I hope everyone had a great Easter weekend, I sure did! My kids were home and I didn't turn my computer on throughout the entire weekend. So what literary works have been filling your time?
I sat drinking several cups of tea in Iraq Kurdistan with one such peacemaker today. Brought up in Europe, now settled back in Kurdistan. With a heart for the poor, a heart to bridge communities so often divided.
oh, you guys love those loglines don't you. Other than no response means no, log lines are the worst thing publishing has imported from the film industry. Honestly I think log lines don't serve a writer well. You have an entire page to work with here, don't try to condense it to a single sentence.
Pen and Platen just hit #1 in the Amazon Anthologies store!
The next step was easy to figure out, slowing down volume 2 of course.
Now the Magazine is pride to have an exclusive interview with Jónsi, but De Morgen didn't cover the yearly Airwaves '08 Festival, and I know people who talked, although very short, with the band in Scotland! And btw I was there too, @ the Sugarcubes concert @ Vooruit, Ghent, but I didn't jump on stage.
This muted blue and green one. The first grannie I made.
As a butch lesbian, I find it shocking and inappropriate that an LGBT advocacy group like Lambda Legal suggests that legally male serially convicted child sexual predators should be given free reign to enter private, protected spaces for women and girls on the basis of those male’s subjective claims of feeling an internal “gender identity”. Further, the assertion by Lambda Legal that males who do not adhere to cultural standards of masculinity would be considered “disruptive” in ANY male setting whatsoever is a claim that every gay and lesbian person should find deeply offensive.
Approach to the base of the temple. The temple door opens slowly. As the door opens it brings forth light from inside. This is the light of innocence and purity. Of love and kindness. Youth and vitality. And Exuberance.
Importance of Data Centers to Business Operations
Everyone who visits my new digs mentions how I seem poised to start a new life here. To them it feels like home.
According CPI (Maoist) statement issued to the media on today, Kishanji was arrested and tortured and then brutally killed. This murder looks much similar to that of Azad’s in July 2010, when Azad was brutally tortured and killed while he was dealing with the Union Government’s offer of peace talks through union Home Ministry appointed interlocutor.
SS: How do you visualize your future?
They also protest up to 15 times on a Sunday. Yes, Sunday. That would be the Sabbath.
But these kids are smart, imaginative, and come up with the weirdest, funniest, most random things.
I am a bad blogger. I'm not bad so much as I am crazy busy. With crazy busy comes little time for all the extras that I love to do.
With its close up view of the world’s second highest peak- the Kanchanjunga, blissfully aromatic tea, and breezy climate that compelled the British to make it a summer sojourn for its soldiers, Darjeeling would find itself on most tourists’ lists of places to visit.
well thats day one of my blog here hope some of that was worth reading ummm yeh check back for more in the coming days!
To find the placement details click on search opportunities and then enter your username and password details. Click on find opportunity (under opportunities) and in the employer field type ‘St Cuthbert’s Hospice’. It will then list all of the opportunities that St Cuthbert’s Hospice have. Note: The placement (year long) positions are Human Resources Assistant and Marketing & Fundraising Assistant (with the retail vacancy being added soon).
I am not suicidal.
**It resides in the monarch’s Reserve Powers not used since 1708, which is no reason why they can’t be. Those same powers can also be used to dismiss a Prime Minister, and if ever one deserved to be shown the door, it’s Cameron, not least because of his lies, but also because he has no mandate whatsoever for the damage he’s inflicting upon the citizens of this country, and because of the increasingly apparent corruption in his government.
I will look at You with wonder
We should all start going into the high streets of every town and city and start to wake up people to the threat of muslim rape gangs in Britain.
Here we have a video of two foxes playing on a trampoline, to me they seem to be playing in the exact way children would, the only difference is the species.
Blood was starting to pour from that hole now and Sid didn’t like it.
(she needed some things from home)
The Holy Spirit gives each one power to live abundantly. Personal Scripture and pray it today.
Black cats vs black girls?
Fareda: What? I never said—
Cuban government because Mr. Gross deserves to come home.”
MONSTEE: Me am…
But really, I mean you know it’s bad when King is folding… whatever will the ‘ex’video girls and Destiny Child members do now???? (okay, that was kind of wrong, but whatever lol.. I was trying to lighten the mood… LOL)
Youngest - That man was very gassy.
In the 1920s, the Salton Sea developed into a tourist attraction, because of its water recreation, and waterfowl attracted to the area. Celebrities used to trail their toes in the brine, but few people dare take a dip today.
"Everyone else gets more time."
How do you know when a piece of art work is done? What are some things you do to know..?
I'm changing a few things about my blog.
The My Creative Sketches May sketch challenge is live! You know what that means... another fabulous sketch and another gorgeous prize package.
Father Almighty set Your seal on me like You have set Your seal on Your Son Jesus Christ! Amen!
"The color. I mean, isn't a little too … uhmmm, loud? I mean, honey, you are already of a certain age."
Roben-Marie Smith This can come in so many forms. There are times when I have a dream that inspires me or lately, it is after spending the day shooting pictures.
As far as "controlling" my kids. Of course I don't control them. Nor do I want to control them. I want to teach them to control themselves.
Jim Thorpe - Rocky Mount Railroaders
Wednesday – A woman is married to a man that is irreparably bad in the bedroom, and is tired of breaking down in tears after each failed attempt. He blames back pain or physical ailments (from the sports he plays during the week), but nothing changes.
Anyways, down to business. We did have a sale over the Holiday weekend which made GreenTeaDAILY $39.99 per box. Equaling about .67 per drink. It did well, so we've decided to keep the sale going on throughout the Holidays. Stop in to one of our retail locations, or you can shop online and use coupon code "save20" at checkout. You do have the option of joining our Loyalty Program which allows you to get each box at $29.99/Month. New Years resolutions are right around the corner so let's get a head start by continuing to drink Green Tea. And remember, if you share GreenTeaDAILY with your friends and family this season we will share back.
General James L. Jamerson, USAF (Ret.)
Will you love me? Will you?
What is a collector to do when someone offers them an autograph of a player they once loved, but now hate? I found myself in this exact situation last week when Brian, of Play at the Plate offered up a Mike Mussina Orioles autograph as part of a trade we were working on. What I decided to do was bury the hatchet, and welcome Mike Mussina back into my collection. The reasoning behind my feelings was flawed to begin with, and all stemmed from Mike's decision to leave Baltimore after the 2000 season, so he could run off to New York and pitch for the much hated Yankees.
because there are always holidays.
I miss you all, and hope to get in a little more time online this next month. 'Hope' being the operative word.
Little did we know, Coco had been saving up all her anger and resentment about being left at the Baby Club all those days. On the way back to Prague, she took her revenge. After we crossed back into the Czech Republic, she threw up on herself one last time. It came out of nowhere, I had no more Air France barf bags, and it was a real doozy.
Only local farms can deliver the very freshest produce. But while the common methods of providing this bounty to consumers—community supported agriculture (CSA) plans and farmers’ markets—are essential components of a revitalizing fresh-food sector, they don’t always provide a sufficiently flexible or robust shopping experience.
**The definitions actually gave us examples, so I'm going to be lazy and not do another one.
I started off with a small tour today but already found one of my favourite builds EVER: “Concrete Soldiers” by Liz Gealach [SLURL]. Her build is an interpretation of a poem which you receive on a notecard, and features a very grey and bleak street silhouette with a lonely sheep.
Today we get up at 5am as we are beginning our Inca Trail to Machu Picchu. We are being picked up at 5.30am and then we are off to kilometre 82 to begin the hike. We drive for an hour and a half and we stop for some breakfast. We are given a cheese and ham sandwich and a banana. We then jump back into the mini-bus to drive the last half an hour to kilometre 82 which is the beginning point of the trail. We arrive and our team are porters are already there packing up the tents and gear for the trip. Our bags are weighed to ensure that the weight is not over 9kgs. The porters then head off to the control point so their bags can get weighed. They are not allowed to carry more than 25kgs on their backs. Once the team has gone through the control point, it is our turn. We line up and show our tickets and passports. Rico is very happy that we get a stamp in our passports. Then we are ready to begin our hike to Machu Picchu. Our first day is 14 kms of hiking and the majority of it is pretty flat. As soon as we cross the bridge to start our walk, it starts raining. All the rain jackets and ponchos come out. It drizzles for the majority of the day. The walking to start off with is really good. Our guide Rubin tells us to stop every hour for a break. After three hours we arrive at our lunch destination. The porters have set up a lunch tent (luckily because it is pissing down with rain at this point). We sit in the tent and are given hot tea to drink. Then our lunch comes out. We are given garlic bread with squash soup. It is delicious! Then our main lunch comes out. We have a choice of rice, meat, coleslaw salad and avocado salad. It is all delicious and we are all full afterwards. We then leave and the porters stay to clean up and pack up the tent. We then walk for another two hours. As we are walking, we are passed by our porters as they RUN carrying their 25kgs. The majority of them are wearing only sandals on their feet and most of these boys are smaller than me! Their strength is amazing. Our guide stops every 30 minutes which i like as it gives us a break. We are all having a break and waiting for the rest of the group to catch up and we look over to the other mountain and we can see our porters. They yell out something to our guide. Our guide then says, there are three bears and a mother bear, lets go! The guide starts walking and he starts to quicken up his pace. Im not sure if we are hurrying away from the bears, or if we are running to them! But i follow at the same pace. Then all of a sudden we look up and 10 metres away there is a bear. He is just a baby. He is yelling out something. We assume trying to find his mother. The bear starts to head down towards the track. Then we look down and there is another baby bear about 2 metres away from us. The bear above then crosses our track and heads to his brother. They then continue to head down. Five minutes later we can see the bears have found their mother and they are heading up the hill, far away from the humans below. It was incredible to see wild bears in their own habitat. It was defiantly one of the highlights of the day.
So next time you’re listening to yours, think about which direction you’re facing and just get lost in the music and worship.
All of that is what it is. I've relaxed there though and I'm used to things being chaos. It's not a reflection of who I am as a woman and where I drop the ball. It's just a reflection of what life looks like and it's neither good or bad. It just is.
Not only did we have pulled pork sandwiches and homemade barbecue sauce, but my husband made a pot of collard greens and I made a pan of macaroni and cheese. It was glorious. Top it off with a glass of sweet tea and it was like home again.
Apple has already confirmed the schedule for WWDC 2011, one of the biggest tech events in the industry, which begins on June 6 till June 10, 2011. Apart from iPhone 5 and Mac OS X Lion Apple is expected to make an announcement regarding its cloud-music system.
Then, a separate group of ladies got together to assemble the bags of food while some teenagers helped out by watching the 237 kids over at Roxanna's house. (Okay, maybe not quite that many. But Mormon's have big families...there were lots of kids.)
Here's how you can enter to win (4 separate chances):
Main (Fell 1st); 2002 BINDAREE (WON), Frantic Tan (UR 5th), Beau (UR 14th); 2003 Bindaree (6th); 2004 Shardam (UR 3rd), Bindaree (UR 6th);
The broad issue posed, however, by the pervasive defensive use of patents is
‘I love you.’
If you've been a reader of my blog, you'll notice my daughter cooks and bakes with me often. It's one of the things I remember doing with my mom growing up and I think it's made me appreciate cooking and baking more than just something that needs to be done. I really enjoy it and I'm glad my daughter enjoys it as well.
This week we say goodbye to Lill, we would like to thank Lill for her beautiful samples throughout her stay with us...good luck Lill in all your future ventures.
I hope you had a great weekend!
2. Diner, Barry Levinson, 1982.
Odd that I did not recognize anyone around me. How was that possible? Some sort of spell maybe? But who could work magic among all these people? Then I remembered the tick bursting into flame. Could Dair work this kind of magic? Had I not just seen wood combust? I took several quick gulps of mead in order to ward off the panic now threatening to send me running. Could all these people work magic?
For a whoppin' near 500 pages, Starcrossed is a fantastic start to what seems like a great series.
It is difficult to discuss religion under Secular Orthodoxy, since it discourages the idea of God. Observant Christians and Jews are relegated to the same essential status as theosophists -- that is, they are people who have forsaken science for superstition. What is obscured by this false dichotomy is the fact that the secular worldview derives its belief system from the heritage of Christian Europe (and thus also the Jews). One may remove the theological philosophy behind it, but Western concepts of right and wrong, of the universe and man's place in it, have not yet diverged significantly from what they were in a time when almost everyone believed in God.
He said: ‘I thought to myself, well, I’m writing about a guy who’s the boss of a Mafia family, and he has to do these things, too.’
ndmpd kill job_id
David Delthony, is he a woodworker? A sculptor? Or a furniture designer? Probably all three. Based in Utah, he forms beautiful sculptural furniture worthy of the finest of derriere’s. Is it sculpture thats furniture… or furniture thats sculpture? Who knows where the intention lies, but I do know that taking something traditionally strong, rustic, and raw from nature… and turning it into something with ribbon-like fluidity makes for striking and very beautiful design!
What is the craziest thing to date that God has called you do to this point in your life?
○ Demagoguery via the airwaves:
On the other side of the road was another paddock with another horse (white).
(d) neglects to shower on time at least once a week due to failed promise to stop after reading "just one more blog"
makes enough to glaze a 4-layer, 8-inch round cake
The movie is about a syndicate who hired a group of people who need to steal 50 cars of different models in a very limited amount of time. Nicholas Cage was forced to accept the challenging tasks to save his brother’s life. The group successfully delivered 49 cars in the port. The last car, which was stole by Cage didn’t make the deadline. And you bet this is the climax of the story–when the lead character faces his detractor.
Grand Total Cost = SGD 2210
I know that God has a purpose and a plan for my life, and He has one for yours as well. This time here on earth is just a pass through, we are just traveling here - our real home is Heaven - but while we are here, we are called to affect as many lives as we can for Christ and I don't take that assignment lightly.
Some people are often hesitant to open their heart because there is a concern that it will make them vulnerable or they may get hurt again like in the past.
Let's be completely honest - I'm a couch potato. Or at least, I'm quite happy being a couch potato. Even though I grew up playing netball, doing ballet, competitively swimming, crashing around a basketball court and swinging a hockey stick, I am not a naturally sporty person.
I'm in the mood to start something like this, and perhaps, after a few weeks, I can start putting together a project containing all the photos, yours and mine...
Notes: Despite the yeast explosion no bottles exploded and the beer developed into a great tasting pale ale.
Surly Brewing Company Hell
Stormy Weather by The Reigning Sound
One of the things about blogging I love is meeting and discovering other bloggers. The blogging community is filled with amazingly bright and talented people, and it so cool to be able to connect them on a daily basis.
STAR-----
The dining room has windows on two sides. The furniture with its simple lines, is original, and the chairs are beautifully sprung, being made of tubular steel and covered with laced leather.
Adams' Pack Station 76th Anniversary Party
-Subscribe to Shushybye on YouTube and leave username if different. (1 entry)
The tips acknowledged by the pedagogue, made it so prosperous. What pedagogue did was to break the words.
Rotwang and Joh have a professional relationship. “As usual, when my experts fail me, I come to you for advice…” says the CEO to the thinker, visiting his strange little house. But there is a deep mutual antipathy between the two, strongest on Rotwang’s side. In his house is a gigantic bust of Hel, whom Rotwang lost to Joh. Each perpetuates her memory—Joh through his son; Rotwang through effigies: first the bust, and now, a mechanical woman he believes can take her place.
Just through his songs..
Little Mary Faber is orphaned when her parents and little sister are wiped out by the Black Death. Mary joins a gang of other orphans running loose on the streets London. When their leader is killed, Mary worries that if nothing changes, she will soon end up with a similar untimely fate. And that's when Little Mary becomes Jacky Faber, Ship's Boy, member of the Royal Navy. The series follows Jacky's adventures from being a Ship's boy, to her eventual discovery of being a Ship's girl...To her relocation to an eminent Boston school for girls, to her accidentally becoming a pirate, nearly being sold into slavery, a Tom Sawer-esque ride down the Mississippi River, being repeatedly captured by the English Navy (mostly for stealing and treason), her stint as a French messenger/spy, a diver of sunken treasure, and of late, a convict being transported to a penal colony in Australia.
It has been a while since I have had a chance to post here, but tonight I sit here and think of my followers who might have missed my little tidbits of information.
The sea is calling me and my honey and we will be traveling to Playa Del Carmen to visit the liquid world again. Thursday can't get here quick enough for me as I pack my gear, bathing suits and books.
150 grams quark or ricotta
Those who call for control and common sense in open-door immigration are demonised as “Nazis” and “Racists", but we are following an honourable tradition of conserving our homogeneity going back at least as far as Queen Elizabeth1 who expelled “the Blackamors” in 1602.
This cocktail party was no evening soiree filled with tuxedoed gents and bejeweled ladies in cocktail dresses, but rather a festive business casual happy hour. Instead of a darkened glamorous room filled with hushed voices and the quiet tinkle of ice cubes floating in gin, this setting was exuberant, filled with laughter and the pearly gray light of a New York April evening. It was the kind of party where the participants stand in intimate little knots leaning toward each other with bent necks and cocked heads because it is too noisy to do otherwise. All around, little groups form and pause before breaking, swirling, and regrouping into new formations like the best kind of kaleidoscope. It’s the kind of party where friends who’d seen each other yesterday hugged, where acquaintances who hadn’t seen each other since the last Edgar Awards caught up with the happenings of a busy and fruitful year, and where strangers met for the first time, often with cries of recognition: “I’ve heard so much about you!” The energy and excitement were invigorating and…did I mention the wine and snacks?
The pace of the rise in passenger traffic quickened last month, as 1.2 million travellers used the airport, 22 per cent more than in the same period last year. To accommodate the growing number of passengers, Adac is pushing ahead with the long-delayed Midfield Terminal. Work is expected to start this year on the structure, which will be capable of handling between 27 million and 30 million passengers a year by its scheduled opening in 2017….
It has been awhile since I graduated from college. When I started college in 1989, the internet as we know it today was a seed of an idea. It was more common to have a word processor in the dorm room than a desktop computer. We bought books the old fashioned way. We went into the bookstore, stacked up a tall armful of big expensive books, got into a long, long line and paid for them. At the end of the semester (or quarter) we got into a different long line and prayed we’d get some money for those books we had bought a few months earlier. In my case, I rarely got much for my books. I majored in zoology and it seemed like my books became obsolete by the end of each semester. It was expensive and frustrating.
On the other hand…
Day 6 yesterday Princess was home from school with the yucky cold. We had preschool orientation so I had to call a babysitter to watch her. Jon Jon was so excited to meet his new friends and teachers. It is a small class of 5 children and 2 teachers.
“Certainly they would, — and break down all my gates if I had them locked, and pull my park palings to let the hounds through.”
Regardless of who making their beer - it is local and I whole heartily recommend trying them when enjoying a meal at Wingers restaurants. They are all familiar, enjoyable and solid beers.
By the way, here is a little PSA to the theater-goers of the world: Do NOT use your cell phones at ANY time for ANY reason (outside of an emergency or to quickly check if that text you received (via vibrate only, of course) was from your sitter to inform you of an emergency). Catch my drift? There was this chick across the aisle who kept using her phone as a freaking flashlight throughout most of the first half of the show. And I am not talking a time or two here--it was beyond ridiculous! At first, I thought I was the only one who was annoyed by this. But then, I started looking around at others who kept looking over at her. And she would turn it off, only to turn it on again right at the best part of a song! UGH! Anyway, after a while, I had had it, and I started snapping my fingers at her to get her attention. But at the same time, the couple next to me (and at the end of our row) also had had it, and the guy got up to go get an usher. Whew! And that was the end of that! So yeah ... keep your cell phones off. We didn't pay for a night at the theatre and for a sitter to watch you flash your cell phone light around, trying to read the playbill.
And now it’s over. Just like that. You let those people slap on a droopy, ill-fitting conclusion and call it a day. And now any sequel that comes after it won’t be as awesome. And it’s too bad, because I know that you could have done better.
(Confession: on longish trips we travel with our own pillows. We generally leave them behind at the last overnight stop.)
Patay!
Okay, I have to put my shoes, belt, jacket, eye glasses, and tooth fillings into the bucket and go through security. What’s your question?
Today's card was meant to be an anniversary card, but just going by the front, it could be for anything really :)
The website has been changed over to the new server. My pictures and other accessories on the blog are no longer coming from that old computer at my house that I was using as a server.
Starting Monday the 13th, there will be 40 items on sale, some favorite items at reduced prices and some brand new things I have been saving up just for this sale.
It's me again, with another all-true bumper sticker tale.
Me: I probably should stop by the Circle K to get a can and fill up with gas. Just to be safe.
Do you see those temperatures coming? Yeah, now this is what I'm talking about. This is what I suffer the OMG I'm just going to spontaneously com-bust temperatures all summer for.
Hanging Hill is another departure from the security of a recurring character series and while it remains a police procedural it lacks the bite of the Caffery stories. Zoe Benedict is interesting enough but the investigation meanders along while Sally goes to work for a very shady character which leads to a tragic event that eventually re-unites the two.
The programme turned to Blair’s work in Israel and Palestine. He visits for one week a month. An entire floor of a luxury hotel is put aside for his use. His office in Jerusalem is part-funded by British taxpayers, and his staff includes three civil servants seconded from Whitehall.
(Wat dryf ’n mens om op ’n dag skielik ’n klomp mense om die lewe te bring? Is daar ’n enkele oomblik dat iets in jou breek, of is daar ’n aanloop? Magda Swart doen verslag… www.beeld.com/In-Diepte/Nuus)
I believe that some hardcore craft fans are trying to convert their friends to the amazing realm of possible craft beers in the wrong way. Very hoppy beers and high alcohol content can scare away the “mass-market” drinkers as they tend to feel out of their comfort zone. I think it’s important to ease these drinkers in slowly and with some simple facts about beer; for example, what the traditional ingredients are, the differences between ales and lagers, and so forth. There’s no need to get too technical about dry-hopping techniques and the subtle differences between hops just yet. The more you throw at them the more they are going to resent you and consider you to be a snob (and no one wants to drink beer with a snob).
Cab Calloway & His Orchestra--The Old Man of the Mountain
Despite the fundamental problems with the “free” contraceptives mandate, leftists usually try to justify it by arguing that it is necessary to help poor women who can’t afford contraceptives (the “think of the poor” appeal to emotion has become the new “think of the children”). But the most appropriate way to do this would be to propose a tax that would subsidize contraceptives for poor women. Unlike insurance, taxes can be and are used to subsidize all sorts of expenses that are predictable yet not used by everyone (like food stamps). The problem with a tax subsidized contraceptives approach, of course, is that such a proposal would sound less appealing than “mandating free contraceptives for women’s health” and would therefore receive even more political opposition than the contraceptives mandate. It would also require an act of a divided Congress to pass such a tax, which would be much harder to accomplish than declaring an executive diktat.
I am so enjoying the revival of the Dick Monologues and our new format-- topic specific pieces. The Sisters Show was, I must say, totally WOW. Next up is our show about PETS! All proceeds go to benefit Austin Pets Alive. Here's the info:
Years of neglect
On to #2....the notion that children need school in order to be MORE exposed to activities and ideas. In some families school may very well be a good option for that. Sure. If people homeschool in order to isolate and separate their children then school may very well be a better option for those kids. Not my choice to make.
It is raining now and the birds are in the trees, safe and quiet. I know i have been here before,preparing for his departure, but I still feel anxious. Have i given him enough; is he ready, really ready for the world outside "the nest"? My empty nest will be cleaned and painted, readied for the return of the children or readied for the sale of the home. Who knows he may actually stay away next summer... Tally does. I am a mother who may no longer have her kids inside the home, but my worry remains inside my soul. There is no preparation for that.
Marc Davis has here mounted his changing portraits (all of which are identifiable in the sketches)
I’m anointed and
Nathan smiled and nodded.
Requirements for the Linkedin Company Page
This weekend was filled with family and I was still recovering from my illness and that left me no time to post on my blog. So I do apologise for the late image.
Former public defender Michelle Moore worked with Watkins’ Conviction Integrity Unit from its 2007 creation until last year. When she left her position, Julie Doucet took over. Moore said Jackson’s and Williams’ cases were initially rejected, until the Conviction Integrity Unit revisited them sometime around 2007 during an intense review of hundreds of cases.
Different things happen when we age. It can get to the point where we don’t have the ability to take care of ourselves. You may have to choose to live in a nursing home, or to stay on your own. This may not be the best option for everyone, but it may be the only one and is a reality to be prepared for. Licensed and trained professionals can provide you with the health care that you need in these environments.
And knowing you still hesitate to go.
A long long time ago, in a far away itty bitty town, a girl named Jen was dreaming of an organized pantry space. And like most, Jen was very excited when her dreams came true.
Among those 1,700 sites are more than 100 national parks with Civil War themes. The narrative on the war examines its root causes; biographies of major players, mil­itary and civilian; and places within the national park system that help illuminate the war. Parks included on the site range from Washington and San Juan Island Na­tional Historical Park to the Florida Keys and Fort Jefferson.
Note: Requires unlocked bootloader and CWM recovery. If you’re partaking in this guide, you’ll likely have the HTC Sync software already installed, but if you don’t you’ll also need it installed in order to continue.
Why are white husbands open to negative streotyping that would be roundly condemned if applied to any other group?
Once you have made your selections, build a new version of your profile (none of the test prints created above automatically save a profile, so you won’t be flooded in test profiles) and use this new profile, the name of which should note the slider values it includes, for printing the work for that location. Repeating this process for another display location is extremely simple, and building a new profile version to match takes only a few seconds. The only time it is necessary to repeat the entire process described above is if you change printers, inks, or papers.
We stalled again in PR1 and I opted to go over the Building Codes we'd worked on the previous week and just make it a solid week of review. It was so much material to cover last week that just getting the Building Codes learned and written in took an overwhelming amount of time and there was very little retention of the 5 reasons for Silent Final E or for the rules about "c" and "g" and when they say /s/ and /j/. We also continued to drill and play games with many of our letter teams that are confusing to her when all compared, teams like "ow" and "aw" and so on. This program is so detailed and excellent and it is going to help her become a fabulous speller, reader and writer.... eventually. But it is a whole lot for a little kid to absorb in the beginning so I have no problem really taking our time with it.
WASHINGTON, March 26, 2012 /PRNewswire via COMTEX/ -- Blackboard Inc. announced a major investment in open source today with news that it has acquired Moodlerooms and NetSpot, two leading providers of open source online learning solutions to the education industry. Both organizations will continue to operate independently to support their clients.
Top Moments:
These are precarious times for a Phillies fan. That once potent office is starting to look increasingly threadbare. Ryan Howard is out for the first part of the season, Chase Utley is a question mark healthwise and the top of the lineup (Jimmy Rollins, Placido Polanco and Shane Victorino) is investing in more Just for Men than stocks. But there’s still the starting rotation, one of the most dangerous combos in all of baseball. In Roy Halladay and Cliff Lee, they have the most consistent, reliable duo that anyone could ask for, and now that Cole Hamels has fully bounced back from his
A poet was I, and I sang that just
Il n'y a pas grand chose d'intéressant à rapporter sur mes séances de muscu. Je ne peux soulever aucun poids avec ma main gauche donc je me concentre principalement sur les muscles abdominaux et les jambes.
At some point we got disconnected from our bodies. We started to breathe and digest with our minds. I think the happiest people are those who are physically aware of themselves, those who are one with the organic being. For a lot of people, the human body is simply the convenient vessel for the brain and the senses.
Shin Inouye, a White House spokesman, declined to answer any questions about how winners were selected or how votes factored into that process, saying only that the entries are appreciated and that they were only able to invite a select group of winners to Washington.
This isn’t to say that extra information about Jesus and his time is irrelevant—far from it! Our reading of the gospels is vastly enhanced by these studies, and even some aspects of the gospels would be inscrutable without them. But that reality does not change the priority of the gospels. Matthew, Mark, Luke, and John had something to say. And it is important for your faith that you learn what that something is.
Handling 7 great comic book characters and link all the stories is a difficult thing. And Joss Whedon impressed me with it. A comic book fan himself, Joss with Marvel’s The Avengers, give us a Hulk Smashing, action packed entertainer. The movie has everything. Action, Comedy, a bit of drama and of course Scarlett Johansson. Several years in the making, The Avengers concludes a journey that Marvel Studios began with Iron Man, and continued through The Incredible Hulk, Iron Man 2, Thor and Captain America. And with the hype created by the movie, it lived up to it. Whedon included clever banter, gripping action and an air of excitement. Whedon has an utter love for comic books, and it is proudly displayed in The Avengers.
Comerford is the first woman and the first Asian American to hold the position of White House executive chef.
...and he starts squirming and screaming bloody murder. Twenty minutes later, and ten minutes of Mr. A holding him down, he looks like someone attacked him with a weed whacker. I can't send him to school like that. All the other 2-year-olds will make fun of him.
7. And they will never invoke it because of what their hands have sent before; and Allah is Cognizant of the unjust.
The lettuces, escarole, tomatoes, cucumbers and herbs were also abundant. I pickled. I sauced. I froze. I dried lots of comestibles during the harvest season. My canning sessions were limited to tried and true favorites like tomato sauce, spicy salsa, dilly beans and zucchini relish.
I just added a layer of batting on top of the existing animal print and the just stapled on my new fabric. It also takes about a yard per x-bench.
In the hands of a master storyteller, you might end up with an interesting tale. This, most likely, ain’t it.
Wil is desperate for his older brother to come back from the dead. But the thing about zombies is . . they don’t exactly make the best siblings.
Informed sources tell Shareology that one of the new tenants slated for Mall of America’s south corridor this fall is …… Microsoft! Watch the GapKids space for one of the first retail stores opened by the Washington company; plan on watching a lot of Xboxes go out the door. Shaping up to be even more fun is the Guru versus Genius Bar battle between Microsoft and their across-the-hall neighbor, Apple… Let the Games begin!
Are you gonna give it up?
Dear Joe and Vicki: How do I go about choosing a tow vehicle to pull a travel trailer? Should I choose the tow vehicle first and then find a trailer it can tow? Or should I first select the trailer and then find a tow vehicle that can pull it? How do I determine whether the tow vehicle will be able to handle the trailer?
From that day on my life would never be the same again.
Yes, I am writing. Aside from blogs, I have started working on a new book. (For all of you asking, “what happened to that other book you were writing and excited about finishing about a year ago?” may answer is, “It’s still around. I’m just not ready to go back to that story line yet.”) So anyway, this new book of mine has a finished outline and quite a bit of background.
Mr. Atallah: "I don't want to be held responsible for messing you up, with the dirt on the pot."
When I recently discovered on Google Book Search two out-of-print short-story anthologies in which my work had appeared (courtesy of the participating Library of the University of Michigan) I was delighted - work which had been seemed to slip off the face of the earth was suddenly current again! - and when they disappeared off GBS a week or so later (as a result of the ongoing dispute?) I was disappointed. How many people will come across those publications if they are not reinstated on Google? In fact the books appeared in the usual Google formula: only a tiny snippet of the contents page of one was readable, and nothing of the other. Personally, though, I wouldn't have cared a fig if they had appeared whole. Actually, I'd have been happier: one of those stories of mine is not available to read anywhere else, the publishers are never going to reprint those books, and I can find only one used copy of one book and four of the other for sale on the web. Neither the publishers nor we contributors are going to make any more money out of those books, and I for one would rather those stories were still being read.
I send you hugs and blessings
BUTCH
Join us tonight in study of the book of Ezra. We will deal with the following questions tonight, hope to see you there.
That particular latest handle was thought up by Mrs Elna Boesak and other like-minded people - and refers to all the people in South Africa who speak Afrikaans i.e. also Afrikaans-speaking people of colour.
President Obama mechanically escalates the “Bush Empire” wars of aggression and drone “robot assassination” policies that have shamefully, unmercifully and illegally slaughtered hundreds of thousands of innocent civilians (People of Color) in Afghanistan, Iraq, Pakistan, Yemen and now Libya.[5] Under President Obama, the CIA sought and obtained virtually unlimited freedom to carry out extrajudicial kidnappings, targeted assassinations; clandestine wars of aggression and drone strikes in secrecy without any meaningful oversight by Congress.
Along with visiting Jean and going to Replacements, I'm looking forward to fried pickle chips, chicken biscuits and spiked Arnold Palmers made with sweet tea vodka. Back on Monday!
mozzarella and shredded parmesean
Cooking the fish without the skin or bones is providing it from cooking with part of the fatty acids that are located next to them. We are not to take full advantage of the special characteristics of it as healthy food.
Each of the over 850 quotes is cited to the original work so readers can go back and read more if a certain quote peaks their interest.
occiput or cephalic — the baby’s head is down, and the baby is facing the mother’s abdomen. This position results in back pain and a prolonged labor.
1) Side One (Saturday)
Wow – what a year it’s been for you since we first met. Could you tell us about the journey you’ve been on since the publication of Devil’s Kiss? What have been the high-points for you? Have there been any low-points?
Vegan author, “Vegan: The New Ethics of Eating” inventor of the “VeggieCard”
I have the books, of course. I have the first soundtrack and a couple of tracks from the other two. Of the films, I only have the first, and in its non-extended version, as I realised I didn't really like the longer versions of the other two and have never got around to buying the first one. So that's five-ninths of a point?
groceries priced just right, for you;
Blessed Christmas Eve to all of you who visit here! May your Christmas be happy, peaceful and filled with love from myself , Gerry, Aliki and Emmanuelle!
Admiral James M. Loy, USCG (Ret.)
Hello friends and family.....Today my daughter, Kara, is 28 years old, which I totally can not believe. She has been such a blessing to me and I thank God everyday that He allowed me to be her Mom...Happy Birthday Kara Sheilda, I love you with all my heart and am SOOOOO proud of you!!!!!
-Please be in prayer for Jen as she, too, is in a time of raising ministry funds for her time coming at the Claremont Colleges. She is leaving Irvine after 6 years of ministering and receiving. Please for her transition to Claremont!
Back in 2003 she was diagnosed with breast cancer and beat it. It was a tough battle. With her photographer daughter Annabel Clark, she published “Our Journal” in The New York Times, detailing the ups and downs of her recovery from a radical mastectomy. The book that followed, ”Journal: A Mother and Daughter’s Recovery from Breast Cancer,” will be released the following year.
a yellow flower cabochon ...
I am very happy to say that I safely arrived in Costa Rica with my big sister on Sunday with no problems. We did have to take a connection though so we had tons of time to snap some beautiful pics from the airplane and some not-so beautiful ones at the airport! Note to anybody reading this, DELTA Airplanes do not accommodate people above 5’5 (Just kidding, but they might as well do people like me and my legs a favour and make this a law).
Those with money would have plates made from pewter. Food with a high acid content caused some of the lead to leach into the food causing lead poisoning and even death. This happened most often with tomatoes, so for the next few hundred years tomatoes were considered poisonous.
I got to exorcise a few demons with the assistance of a handful of characters, some plot, and lots of dialog. Who would have thought writing could be so cathartic.
Plutarch
Weekly Starting Weight: 277.8
Weather: HOT
All the perfumes of Arabia will not sweeten this little hand (V.i.50-51).
Of course, the Census is interested in providing a snapshot of the current situation, not making a value judgment. I’ve taken the position that opting out of the workforce is not intrinsically bad: it’s only bad when parents are forced into it by a lack of other options. It’s clear that we’re still not living in a golden age of work flexibility: for too many moms and dads, there are only two choices:the 40+ hour week or the at-home option. I’d love to know where the numbers would go if there were ways to structure home and career with more precision.
Of the test Dr. Olson said researchers learned, “We can make them resistant to obesity,” but that wasn’t all,
A few blogs ago I talked about the great day out we had on La Margarita riding out to the little house on the prairie and enjoying a tasty asado . It was a fun day for sure and some of the readers of this blog asked if I had any more photos so here they are. I put together a slide show and introduced some the people on the ride - have a look. This weekend we are doing it again with some guests who are on La Margarita and I am really looking forward to it
3. Leave it for a few hours, I left mine overnight before I used it.
Go to Staples.com and click on "Weekly Ad" on the top right. I had to open it in Internet Explorer as Firefox wouldn't open it. Then, click on the "special offer" link on the left to print the $3 coupon!
Lazy Rich
Some of my best songs come from pre-made cardio fitness compilations. They’re the right BPM and are already cross faded to blend nicely from one to another. I then mix in songs from my personal collection and voila!
I Love honour and respect Earth Mother Gaia
I do play games with Emma, and we will play games as a family, on occasion, but I don't like to infringe on Da's time with Emma. After all, if I play games all day with Emma, she isn't really in the mood to play more games when Da gets home.
On the flip side I also see the act of punishing oneself as the bloody practice of personal grooming. Personal grooming includes the unholy mani/pedi, the many methods of brutal hair removal and sometimes the over cooked “self tanning” torture; all in the name of looking good on the dance floor. It all sometimes hurts. Sometimes we take it too far, but is it all worth it? Yes, because I look amazing. Wink, false eyelashes!
Earlier in the week, a very close buddy (and colleague to boot) sent me a quick message. ”beware, I think you are getting into the fast culture too!”.
Thank you for stopping by and as always check out Iamroses!!
INTA Academic Day and Annual Meeting Registration Information: INTA offers a variety of discounted registration options for INTA professor and student members and non-member professors and students to attend the 2011 INTA Annual Meeting. For Annual Meeting registration information, please contact Carin Diep-Dixon at cdiep@inta.org."The IPKat urges his academic friends, foes and colleagues to come to the INTA Meeting if they can. The organisation has done so much to make itself academic-friendly and has very accommodating registration rates. Also, once you're there you don't need to spend anything on food or drink since there's so much of it around -- so if your institution won't pay for you to go, make it your holiday instead!
“I’ve lost a baby.”
I went to the Camarillo Outlets to see if we could score a free package of Adidas underwear from the Factory outlet store that I posted here. Bummer... we missed out on that deal. The lady said they gave out their last package that morning. The coupon expires 6/14 or will supplies last. I guess they didn't last until June 14th. LOL
So stretch those arms without delay and give someone a hug today!!!
Idle Chat is taking away from your productivity. Those are your money-making hours. A term for this wasted time is Time Diarrhea. Gross, but I am sure you get the point. The people who are taking up valuable chunks of your money-making hours are called Time Robbers.
Which company they came from?
His other notable translations into English include the translation of Jagannath Prasad Das’s Desha Kala Patra into ‘A Time Elsewhere’. He has founded an organisation atBhubaneswar called ‘Rupantar’, which is devoted to the cause of translation. ‘Rupantar’ has already published many volumes of Oriya books in English translation.
They were all legitimate excuses, and I believed them all to be true when I said them. But, against my will, this past year has given me a lot of empty time to think about what I actually want. I thought I wanted to go to grad school and that I would get a mediocre office job and put some money away until I went to that grad school.
So we enjoyed the snow that stuck last Monday for exactly a week, as this morning it was all gone when we woke up. It was mostly clear and sunny and cold all week, with just enough snow falling to make me nervous going to work on Friday, but even that had calmed down and melted off the roads before it was time to go home.
Eating healthy takes more time, more effort and more money than eating poorly does.
For the sixth and final event of the season, the project invites some of the best local bands to record a live album at the theatre.
As companies continue to look for ways to cut costs and optimize real estate… Could this be the future of retail? We wonder how soon until this trend makes its way to Canada … and who will be the first to take the leap?
in my head,
It's a problem and I admit to it.
It’s used against you for Irish jokes and the BBC
In the event of a tie, we have the customary tie breaker: which has the better rear cover photo of Monk?. Is it:
Waiting for a train to go or a bus to come, or a plane to go or the mail to come, or the rain to go or the phone to ring, or the snow to snow or waiting around for a Yes or No or waiting for their hair to grow. Everyone is just waiting.
He flows down the line well on plays going away from him, displaying great pursuit with his strong motor.
Uh-oh, I thought. Please, please don’t tell this woman why you want those herbs, I prayed silently.
Chick-fil-A chicken nuggets*, strips* and a spicy chicken sandwich*
“It is not surprising that, during a time of transformation when people face major changes in practices that had been ongoing for many years, there will be some discontent, disruption, and even pushback aimed at slowing the pace of reform,” Gist writes, adding that she hopes everyone will “put aside their differences, avoid the blaming, and work together in the best interest of those who need their help most urgently: the students of Central Falls.”
** Republished in Msgr. Delassus’ work “The Anti-Christian Conspiracy” by Desclee de Brouwer in 1910, Vol. III, pp. 1035-1092.
We had a lot of celery in the house thanks to a recipe so I decided to try the old food coloring & celery experiment with Dylan. I wasn't too sure how he would handle the waiting part. Then my friend, Stacey, gave me the best idea - set it up before nap time. This is exactly what we did and after nap, the results were ready.
1 deed
And the not-one-but-two new food-related businesses -- a grocery and a cafe -- that are taking over a couple of the empty buildings in my little town's historic-but-sadly-almost-vacant downtown. Nice.
Where: Georgia Aquarium, parking deck rooftop
A: ABC does not consider page numbering a requirement of a digital replica edition. Publishers may eliminate page numbering in the digital edition or adjust page numbering without impacting the qualification of a digital replica.
space for them that reflect who they are what what they love! it is one of the things i love most about what i do!
This is a FREE event – Refreshments will be provided
Green scalloped border: EKSuccess border punch
What are good examples of independent journalism taking on critical issues?
“Science arose only in the West because efforts to formulate and discover laws of nature only made sense if one believed in a rational creator.” Even the misnamed “Dark Ages” were actually times of technological development. Likewise historians have determined that the Spanish Inquisition was “a quite temperate body that was responsible for very few deaths and saved a great many lives by opposing the witch hunts that swept through the rest of Europe.”
I couldn't get a good shot with the swatter, so (after moving Thing One's bed out from the wall) I sprayed it with the poison. The wasp shook a little, waved it's arms and legs in an effort to try to get the foam off of it, lost it's grip on the blind string, fell, hit the window ledge on it's way down, landed on the floor, shook some more and died. I felt bad again. :-(
It had taken Ellis a long time to realize that Boggs didn'’t generally keep friends. He could be too overbearing, too blunt, too indifferent, too chatty, too silent. But somehow, because Ellis worked for him and because Boggs loved the work, Ellis was shielded from the worst of these traits. Moreover, by the nature of the work they were often seated side-by-side for long periods -- in airports, airplanes, rental cars, and hotel bars as they traveled to inspect accident scenes and vehicles -- and the demands of the work curtailed other relationships even as the two of them were pushed together. They talked about books, and they joked easily, and they could be silent easily.The title of the novel comes from the type of work that Ellis and Boggs do: they reconstruct how and why car crashes occurred, using forensic engineering techniques. I'm an engineer myself, and I worked in accident reconstruction for a while. It's very interesting work but discomforting in the way that it applies cold, analytical techniques to examining situations that are full of coincidence and human drama.
I took it as a sign of bad things to come.
Dena is thankful for her creative life, which is varied and full. In between driving carpools, helping her boys with homework, and shuttling kids to soccer practice, she writes, speaks to women’s groups, and performs part-time at a Christian-owned professional music theater, Rockbox Theater.
At the end of a”mega-fun”* weekend. Three of our kids trickled in late, late Thursday night and it was all out fun from then on. So here’s my top 8:
he called out to them
Patrice Rushen – Keyboards, James Gadson – Drums, Cash McCall - Guitar
7. Help Me Scrape the Mucus off My Brain 2:56
The book starts with Doreen visiting Santorini Island in Greece, where she was contacted by powerful group of angels, calling themselves ‘Angels of Atlantis’. In meditation, throughout her time away from her home, she was taken on a deep spiritual journey into the healing temples of Atlantis. Following her intuition she visited various sites in England, Scotland and Ireland and received profound insights about healing ourselves, the planet and our role within the universe.
So I approached Lulu as a fan of both artists - albeit a fan who felt that neither had recorded any decent material for over twenty years! And maybe being a fan of both is the key to liking the project?
The campaign website of National Assembly speaker (and presidential candidate) Dioncounda Traoré says he is in Burkina Faso, where he has met about the situation in Bamako with President Blaise Compaoré. This would explain why the CNRDR doesn’t have him in custody.
Yesterday, we tried to lay low at home and get the kids rested up. Lydia did go out on a daddy date last night. She and Steve went to dinner and then her first MOVIE!!
Fareda: Don’t worry, sister. Nothing will happen. Our stature will protect us from any investigation. Come let us sleep.
We have come up with an idea. An idea that is a notch above the rest that are anything like it!
find a way to discover new things,
So you just keep asking, what everybody’s asking
Well, his face fell and he said: “Yeah. Yes, I would.”
Firstly, to say I saw it coming would be untrue, but in hindsight, we were up against an unprecedentedly hostile and well-resourced campaign from our opponents. In the light of this, some facts have to be faced by the present leadership.
BAD STUFF: Another mockumentary, full of all the good and bad things mockumentaries entail. Unfortunately, there are usually more bad things.
That is a short précis of my latest novel which I have been instructed to send to the head of BBC’s TV English drama department for the attention of a Ms. Madushami Samarasinghe.
But retreating from the shore is probably only likely in places where most structures are single-family houses and where land is abundant.
We have a wide range of recent air-conditioned vehicles (model 2011.2012) as needed according to your needs . All our vehicles are insured and our drivers chauffeur are having a prefecture professional licence authorization licensed professional authorized prefecture including a regular medical visit examination and the first aid certificate.
Some folk can work Facebook and Twitter like champs. I can't. Well, technically I can. Meaning I can do the technical stuff. I haven't put the effort into my own pages so much (OK, at all), but I have set up a Facebook page for Steel Magnolia Press with a custom splashpage and given Jennifer's page a facelift as well.
Arnold M. Ludwig, M.D.
The lowest risk vehicle for a teen driver? Large and luxury SUVs, where the crash rates for youths were as little as 10% greater than for adults, and posed a lower crash risk than all but the largest cars.
One of the reasons cited for Najib’s urgency to hold snap polls has been that the Umno-led government was running short of funds after distributing a recent slew of cash aids to gain favour with voters in GE-13.
30 Squat Jump + Diamond Touch (touch your toes together when you jump up)
“Very much so, Agent Brooks. For right now, just stay in the city. My associates and I will contact you tomorrow.”
I wrapped them up in twine and placed them in a pretty seashell box I had been saving. (Am I the only one who saves every box and gift bag they receive?) It's the little touches that make a gift so special!
I had seen these before on the web and some other blogs before here is my own spin on it.
That won’t be happening this time around. When the crisis is over, whatever form it takes, the United States—or whatever assortment of successor nations end up dividing its territory between them—will be a shattered, bankrupt, resource-poor Third World failed state (or collection of failed states) that will likely have to struggle hard even to regain basic levels of political and economic stability. That struggle will be pursued in a world in which energy and other resources are getting scarcer each year, energy- and resource-intensive technologies are being abandoned by all but a very few rich and powerful nations, and unpredictable swings in temperature, rainfall, and other climatic and ecological factors make life a good deal more difficult for everyone. In that not-so-far-future America, the comforts and conveniences most of us now take for granted will be available only to the rich and powerful, if they can be had by anyone at all.
1 blind
Do you ever struggle with pride? Now be honest. Don't lie to me. Or to yourself.
“Yes. Now what is the point of this line of questioning?”
Andra doesn’t seem too harsh on Elspeth, but commands her to was the dishes (and there are a lot) and then scour the pots, and because she angered Ariel, she will be worked hard, Ariel doesn’t forget about petty anger. But it is such hard work, and Lila torments Elspeth whenever Andra’s back is turned, that I don’t know how long she can take it before she snaps and tries to torture Lila (various methods have run through her mind, by midday, so it is a possibility). It will be interesting to see how long she will be forced to do this work, before doing something ‘easier’, or is this her job forever?
They are also both running with the cross country team, and doing unbelievably well. I've always known that junior high boys are ridiculously fast--like fleas, really. But I had no idea how, with some intense coaching and conditioning, that my Pickle boy could be hearing things like, "You have the ability to become a truly great cross country runner." I had no idea that by watching my boy run, I would be so inspired that my entire understanding of who he is and what makes him tick has changed dramatically. And watching the Frog improve her time, meet after meet, mile after mile, has been inspiring, too. She has been able to change her attitude from, "I'm running well and that makes me happy," to, "I'm running well, but I know I can run faster, so I'm going to work really hard toward that." That inspires me, too.
The last day of school came. Prizes were handed out, and I received a biography of Joan of Arc, which I have to this day. As we lined up at the door to leave the classroom for the last time, Miss Shoemaker had a few words and a Holy Card for each of us. Gary was standing behind me. As I left, I looked back to see Miss Shoemaker hand him a Holy Card of St. John Bosco. "This is the patron saint of boys who have lost their way.", she told him. "Pray, and he will help you." Then she patted his back. He mumbled his thanks, and sped past me and out the door.
Paper: lucky limeade (SU), heavenly white (PaperTemptress), designer paper (BG)
you got there (this could be a separate
Ed Hardy is a brand that makes a statement with tattoo-inspired art. The brand exudes rebellious attitude with bold designs, bright colors, rhinestones, and quintessential messages.
Well, I guess there is always Door Number 8.
I know, I know. I change paint colors more than Jennifer Lopez changes husbands.
See, when politicians leave this earth, their bodies lie in state, while thousands note their passing, and proclaim that they were great.
There are many subtle points to consider in writing arbitration and applicable law clauses. Patent laws differ around the world. The use of discovery in arbitration can be limited and the generally accepted procedures for arbitration are changing. The licensee and licensor are advised to have legal counsel study the circumstances for each licence carefully before deciding on the most appropriate provisions for such clauses.
When he got down on his knees and undid my jeans I was somewhat startled.
Ben Slob a dob a deb!
One should always have a hobby. It really doesn’t matter whether you’re a teenager, an adult or a senior, people always need a way to relax, a way to vent their creativity and fulfill their natural desire to create. You discover amazing things about yourself and the world around you when you commit to a creative activity in your free time. You become calmer, more confident and you feel satisfied with your life. (This is NOT an ad for viagra… honestly.)
8. It should go without saying, but DON’T pitch me your book in the bathroom.
Hard-won personal property rights were intimately entwined with the gradual emergence of more general freedoms in both England and the American colonies. Shortly after these freedoms were won the United States gained its independence, then took these new rights a critical step further by disallowing hereditary titles and extractive rights altogether.
Immediately, the Emperor declared war on Serbia and everybody’s allies got drawn in. It was A-H, Germany, the Ottoman Empire and Bulgaria against pretty much everybody else and the reasons were much more subtle and complex than just the assassination – it had more to do with trade and borders. Like always.
Visitors leave things behind. Wrappings and cloths. I have to leave the apartment to realign. Then I can come back and hide everything away.
GS Media Watch
"She called me a smelly warthog."
African Americans and Latino Americans have exerted themselves more as rising media influences as they have marketable stars and media strength. African American actors like Will Smith, Denzel Washington and Halle Berry became household names in the marketing of films. Tyler Perry starred, wrote and directed his own several films to cater to African American audiences. Latino Americans have national broadcast affiliate strength with networks in Univision and Telemundo. Asians have some media control in the U.S., but it’s relegated more to larger media markets like New York or Los Angeles areas. More cable and satellite outlets have made imported Asian programming available to homes all over the country.
For Lunar Festival you have to collect coins from each zone, and for Midsummer you put out fires. To do this as a guild, you can gather up two-person mounts or just escort lowbies to each zone. Or you can group with others your level and go as a group to get each one. Here is a picture of when we took some lowbies across Eastern Kingdom one year:
I started potty training when Norrin was two and half years old; the usual boy age to start. Whenever I talked about our potty training challenges with “typical” moms, they were all quick to tell me “all boys take a long time.” Then proceeded to tell me how it took them three weeks with their boy as opposed to the one week it took for their girl (or something crazy like that). And these moms offered suggestions, reward methods, books to read…but I knew none of these things would work for Norrin.
And then my hand paused. Next on the pole hung an overcoat of my father's, and a cream-colored swing coat that had been my mother's.
Ryan sent some 88' Topps and Oriole team set needs, the highlight being a UD Masterpiece Erik Bedard jersey card. I have never opened any UD Masterpieces, but I must say these relic cards are really nice with the dark bordered frame.
Yamazaki
I'll let you in on another really tasty, simple way to prepare it. Wash and dry your asparagus really well. Trim off the woody ends and those bitter little points. Roll it in low fat mayonnaise to coat . . . and then roll it in grated Parmesan Cheese. Place on a buttered sheet of parchment paper you've placed on a baking tray and roast it at a hot temperature (200*C/400*F/ gas 6) for about 8 to 10 minutes (depending on the thickness of the spears) until the cheese is melted, the spears are tender and the whole thing is scrummy, Scrummy, SCRUMMY!
23. Ghost Town
It disappoints me that people have accused Sunny of being a gold-digger. There is absolutely no evidence that she intends to marry Captain Picard or otherwise milk his considerable assets. Why can’t people just accept she might have a fetish for older men? Aren’t women allowed to be eccentric?
“I then wrote the second one The Gangster’s Runner because of the good reviews. It’s about the people I was involved with and how I was used in the underworld as a drug runner and a drug enforcer and money collector. Ecstasy, coke and hash.
“to have a voice and to use it”
So far just the backgrounds worked on. Lots more work needed!
Now she knows all the proper words,
"The authorities" are losing tax on this, because they impose a levy on pre-made, pre-packaged cigarettes. The roll-you-own shops don't pay the levy because they don't sell pre-packaged cigarettes: they just provide a way for the customer to produce themselves something that is similar, but not the same as pre-packaged cigarettes. Thus as all good entrepreneurs, they exploit a loophole left by the authorities.
I’ve been so consumed with the production of The Crucible I’m directing, that I’ve found it difficult to get fired up about anything enough to make a blog out of it, and when I do think of something to write about, I’ve been having a difficult time really pinning it down in a logical way. For this blog alone, I’ve thought about the following:
More (maybe) later,
Coni was my friend and solace growing up, many times throughout high school when I was feeling friendless, all I had to do was go over to Coni and she would stand by me and allow me to cry my hurt feelings out on to her mane. Oh she always smelled so wonderful!!! That special scent only my good friend carried... I can almost smell it now..
Things are really hopping here at SVJ Headquarters....Though Mr SVJ & I have gone to separate corners of the house after an 'artistic' disagreement & I'm ENJOYING a few moments of peace & quite....hahahahahaSNORT....!!
It is important to understand my own bias and perception in the statements that I make, and either, think to get to the real data which will give me a clearer picture of the situation, or make the reasons for my belief known to get better understanding.
Hello and happy Friday to everyone!
So where we left off, I was working part time at Macy's and had two interviews, one at Bellingham Christian School and one at the Chrysalis Inn and Spa as a spa receptionist. Now, since you all faithfully read my facebook updates :P, I know that you are all aware of my current job. But humor me.
Once again thank you so much for being a part of Beading Babes.
It is said that in his earlier years, Ritchie would physically restrain people from jumping off the cliff, like when he once tackled a man on the edge of a cliff to prevent him from killing himself, while his wife called the police. However, as he got older, he would simply offer distraught people at the edge of the Gap a cup of tea and someone to talk to.
Pre-heat oven to Gas Mark 2.
A CBS casting associate said that she had found my blog. Part of her email read,
Being in a Christian school (which doesn't exist anymore) doesn't immune you from name calling and rhyming... I was called Valerie, Calorie, salary, Mallory (nothing wrong with this one!), dallery, etc.
I finally get to join the swiss roll craze made popular by Junko's 彩繪蛋糕卷, thanks to the guidance from Cathy. Look at the beautiful swiss roll that we have made. Trust me, it not only looks pretty, it tastes fabulous too! You have my word on it. :)
7) The Other Guys In and Out of the Shot - Speaking of the fashion sense of Reed Rothchild and Buck Swope, John C. Reilly and Don Cheadle do more than an admirable job living up to their being cast as porn studs. Granted, they may not have a certain attribute that Dirk Diggler has (see number ten in our list) but they hold their own as the necessary second string stud material. We also get Philip Seymour Hoffman as Scotty J., a typically queer (in several senses of the word) PSH kind of character and William H. Macy as Little Bill, the most pathetic but also possibly the most sympathetic character outside of Moore's Ms. Waves.
There are SMARTIES to boost your brain power and
hope they can get some photos to me :o)
Time for a new Digi Darla challenge. This time of the year is prefect for a Think Spring challenge. We have had such a mild winter...and then on February 19, we got hit with a snow storm. The day before it was 60 degrees and I would have sworn Spring was here. They thought we could get 8". Luckily it was only 4" and by mid-day Monday the temp was up to 45, so it didn't last long.
I choose to see them, to look into the face of the devil. I don’t know if what I do actually makes a big difference or any difference at all, but I’ll be damned if I ever stop trying.
This also reminds me of another runaway, Jonah, who sought to flee from God and get lost, heading for distant Tarshish. You cannot hide from God. Reading the book of Jonah, we find that he learned that fact the hard way and also had to come to himself.
Avantika got up in the morning with her eyes swollen. She hadn’t slept properly for quite few days in a row now. She looked at herself in the mirror. She looked horrible. “Probably he does not like me anymore.” After shoveling snow for half an hour, she managed to get her car out of the parking lot. The traffic at Boston was expectantly slow moving and driving was difficult as visibility was practically zero. It was still snowing heavily. Avantika was weary, yet she wanted to go to office. Her mind was restless. She desperately wanted to divert it to something else. “He must have been with Gauri yesterday. They are only friends, but then why did he not call me? And he is roaming around with that bitch very often nowadays. How insensitive can one be? Should I not be important to him than any other girl? Is it wrong to expect that? God whats happening to me? Concentrate on driving Avantika.” She thought as her car slid slightly at the traffic signal.
My Sister GS Creations whole store is also 40% off through Monday-
It is more important at this time to remain steadfast and resolved to maintain the Light that now abounds upon Earth, and it will continue to do so lifting the vibrations. The levels of your consciousness cannot remain stagnant, and must rise up as a result. Already it is transmuting areas of darkness, and we find that it is reaching into the hearts of those who have closed it off. As you quickly approach Ascension, so will those souls who cannot absorb such vibrations have to leave the Earth. Their path is destined to take them on to a time line that allows a continuation of their present experiences. There is no choice involved, as you cannot rise up unless you are already of the higher vibration. As we have already mentioned, all souls will have already decided their future.
Many of you have probably heard of Fat Mum Slim's 'Photo a Day' monthly photo challenge and I've always admired from a distance. It adds another element to just taking a picture each day, and I'll be honest I struggle with remembering that one. Having to make it fit a particular theme will definitely be difficult, but I figure I'll try it once! I'll be posting my pictures on Instagram.
Stephanopoulos: good morning Ron Paul
Pretty cool, right? What was even cooler is that Julie kindly sent them to me in 2 different sizes, which was lucky since the journal I'm curently working in is too small for the large 12x12 size.
But I’m all right now All right now
What inspired you to write Between Two Seas?
(The class was in uproar )
The reader may not even notice the failing!
Wes: I have heard that we do in fact have many more chakras in our bodies than the main ones. Is this true?
"Relvin! Clearseer!"
Remove the bowl from the heat and stir in the coconut, vanilla, and coconut extract (if using). Cover with plastic wrap, and refrigerate until it is firm enough to scoop, about 2 hours.
And, I love my house. For a looooong time I have wanted to be a home owner and I am so happy to be one and to own this house.
If you can meet the liberals and the Labour
Here is how to app works. You install the free Bartab app from the app store, onto your mobile device. You then log into your Facebook account from the Bartab app. Once you're connected, pick a bar, the drink you want to purchase and choose your lucky Facebook friend. The drink is then sent to your Facebook friend via a posting on their wall and through a text message on their phone, giving them specific instructions on how to claim their drink. Once the drink is sent to the lucky Facebook friend, they then have 90 days to claim their drink. Recipients can claim their drink by showing the bartender their digital drink ticket. Once the drink recipient accepts their digital drink ticket, they have five minutes to claim their drink from the bartender.
When it comes to comedy, there is a fine balance between humorous and grotesque. In the realm of spoof comedy, that balance is even more precarious, because when you spoof something that everyone is familiar with, you'd better make darn sure that you hit every point that deserves to be hit. And hard.
and testimonies of our ancient civilizations.
I deal with New England, and half the states in New England are two party consent states, so you just say it all the time, that way we always cover our butts. Anyhow, well thank you for doing this, I appreciate that, I think it's pretty cool. You guys as hot out there as we are? I'm out here in Buffalo, not that far from you geographically, so...
Further commenting on the launch Ms Ekta Kapoor, Joint Managing Director, Balaji Telefilms Ltd said, “After Bade Acche Laggte Hai ruling the charts, we at Balaji are all geared up for yet another interesting show – Kyaa Hua Tera Vaada which celebrates marriage after 10 years. Through this show we want to show our viewers how the relationship between a husband and wife changes through time but love remains constant. I am extremely delighted to take the relationship with Sony Entertainment Television to another level with the launch of Kyaa Hua Tera Vaada and hope that we are able to create magic together once again”
The bait-and-switch
in Santa Cruz, CA
chick chick chick (that's the sound of a squirrel chewing some nuts ;)
Pause. Here’s the time to meditate and dial down. I’m getting ahead of myself and that’s uncalled for. I’ll just keep doing what I’m doing. A little something each day so long as it’s in the art/life vein. Let’s simplify, gonna focus on some paintings and drawings for next couple of days.
Spent my time training the birds. Put them through their paces.
Through the ages, the bronze horn falls out of favor, but the DORD continues to echo, and eventually makes its way into the ear of a dictionary editor in 1934. Finding the note as lovely as the ghost who blew it out of the bronze horn centuries ago, the editor has no choice but to include it in the dictionary. Several decades later, Mithra sees “dord” in the dictionary (Mithra does, indeed, read every book which comes into print, but does not read them at the speed of light.) and finally reincarnates Davy as a TV star and musician (Again, as a newborn baby first.) Davy at last experiences the wonders of technology he future-glimpsed long ago, and the teen idol fame he sought since before Bronze Age. Then he dies, this time from a heart attack. But the DORD echoes on.
Refusing to take ownership makes life easier by eliminating responsibility. Those who dabble in magical thinking never take responsibility for anything. Not even their own actions. They have abandoned their stake in the society while constantly demanding their share of what they insist is coming to them. And if the rioters succeed in destroying the ownership society and replacing it with the looter society, in which no one owns anything and no one, except their scapegoats, are responsible for anything, then civilization dies beneath their flames and slogans.
MELROSE TRADING POST held in the Fairfax high school parking lot!!
In the late winter/early spring of this year things got dramatically worse. C told me that he was having a lot of trouble in class because of kids chewing gum or snacking around him. He could not stand to hear his father or sister chew anything at all, ever. He described the feelings these sounds engendered in him -- terror, rage, panic, a feeling like he was going to die, an urge to do violence to the offender. C has seen a number of occupational and behavioral therapists over the years for his Asperger Syndrome but we were between therapists at the time -- the ones we really liked no longer accepted our insurance, and the ones on our provider list were ones that C did not like and with whom he would not cooperate, rendering any attempt at therapy useless. We didn't know whom to call or what to do.
Maybe it’s because I don’t feel that I’m giving my writing the time and energy it deserves. I’ve become lacksidasical and unmotivated. I’d like to be able to push through it, but I don’t seem to have the right attitude necessary to stay on task and remain focused on the end goal. Because I’m not making the time for it, I often feel rushed or pressured into writing: and that doesn’t assist creativity.
Until then comrades!
Using mysterious abilities, Sarah escapes, only to run directly into Evan Valente, a handsome, charismatic stranger who helps her back to safety. But why is Evan out in the forest so early in the morning?
Shit creative, shit results = client blames agency, agency loses.
